Arkansas, session 2025, SB230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 51, is amended to read as
follows:

CHAPTER 51
ARKANSAS TRUST INSTITUTIONS ACT

Subchapter 1 — Arkansas Trust Institutions Act

23-51-101. Title.
This chapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Trust Institutions Act”.

23-51-102. Certain definitions.
(a) For the purposes of this chapter:
(1) “Account” means the client relationship established with a
trust company involving the transfer of funds or property to the trust
company, including a relationship in which the trust company acts as trustee,
*ANS145*
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
executor, administrator, guardian, custodian, conservator, bailee, receiver,
registrar, or agent, but excluding a relationship in which the trust company
acts solely in an advisory capacity;
(2) “Act as a fiduciary” or “acting as a fiduciary” means to:
(A) Accept or execute trusts, including to:
(i) Act as trustee under a written agreement;
(ii) Receive money or other property in its capacity
as trustee for investment in real or personal property;
(iii) Act as trustee and perform the fiduciary
duties committed or transferred to it by order of a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(iv) Act as trustee of the estate of a deceased
person; or
(v) Act as trustee for a minor or incapacitated
person;
(B) Administer in any other fiduciary capacity real or
tangible personal property; or
(C) Act pursuant to an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction as executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased person
or as a guardian or conservator for a minor or incapacitated person;
(3) “Administer” with respect to real or tangible personal
property means, as an agent or in another representative capacity, to
possess, purchase, sell, lease or insure, safekeep or otherwise manage the
property;
(4) “Affiliate” means a company that directly or indirectly
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a trust
institution or other company;
(5) “Authorized trust institutions” means any state trust
company, subsidiary trust company, or trust office of a trust institution
located in Arkansas;
(6) “Bank” means a state bank, national bank, any bank chartered
by any state of the United States or any foreign bank organized under the
laws of a territory of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico,
Guam, American Samoa or the United States Virgin Islands, the deposits of
which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;
(7) “Bank supervisory agency” means:
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(A) Any agency of another state with primary
responsibility for chartering and supervising a trust institution; and
(B) The United States Office of the Comptroller of the
Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Board of Governors
of the Federal Reserve System, the Office of Thrift Supervision [abolished]
and any successor to these agencies;
(8) “Branch” with respect to a depository institution has the
meaning set forth in § 23-48-702;
(9) “Capital” means:
(A) The sum of:
(i) The par value of all shares of the state trust
company having a par value that have been issued;
(ii) The consideration fixed by the board in the
manner provided by the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101
et seq., for all shares of the state trust company without par value that
have been issued, except a part of that consideration that:
(a) Has been actually received;
(b) Is less than all of that consideration;
and
(c) The board, by resolution adopted not later
than sixty (60) days after the date of issuance of those shares, has
allocated to surplus with the prior approval of the commissioner; and
(iii) An amount not included in subdivisions
(a)(9)(A)(i) and (ii) of this section that has been transferred to capital of
the state trust company, on the payment of a share dividend or on adoption by
the board of a resolution directing that all or part of surplus be
transferred to capital, minus each reduction made as permitted by law; less
(B) All amounts otherwise included in subdivisions
(a)(9)(A)(i) and (ii) of this section that are attributable to the issuance
of securities by the state trust company and that the commissioner
determines, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, should be classified
as debt rather than equity securities;
(10) “Capital base” means the sum of capital, surplus, and
undivided profits, plus any additions and less any subtractions which the
commissioner may by rule prescribe;
(11) “Charter” means a charter, license or other authority
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
issued by the commissioner or a bank supervisory agency authorizing a trust
institution to act as a fiduciary in its home state;
(12) “Client” means a person to whom a trust institution owes a
duty or obligation under a trust or other account administered by the trust
institution or as an advisor or agent, regardless of whether the trust
institution owes a fiduciary duty to the person. The term includes the non-
contingent beneficiaries of an account;
(13) “Commissioner” means the Bank Commissioner then in office
and, where appropriate, all of his or her successors and predecessors in
office;
(14) “Company” includes a bank, trust company, subsidiary trust
company, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association,
business trust, foundation, or another trust;
(15) “Control” means:
(A) The ownership of or ability or power to vote,
directly, acting through one or more other persons, or otherwise indirectly,
more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of a class of
voting securities of a state trust company or other company;
(B) The ability to control the election of a majority of
the board of a state trust company or other company; and
(C) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a
controlling influence over the management or policies of the state trust
company or other company as determined by the commissioner after notice and
an opportunity for hearing;
(16) “Department” means the State Bank Department;
(17) “Depository institution” means any company chartered to act
as a fiduciary and included for any purpose within any of the definitions of
“insured depository institution” as set forth in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1813(c)(2) and
(3);
(18) “Equity capital” means the amount by which the total assets
of a state trust company exceed the total liabilities of the state trust
company;
(19) “Equity security” means:
(A) Stock, other than adjustable rate preferred stock and
money market (auction rate) preferred stock;
(B) A certificate of interest or participation in a
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
profit-sharing agreement, collateral-trust certificate, preorganization
certificate or subscription, transferable share or participation share,
investment contract, voting-trust certificate, or partnership interest;
(C) A security immediately convertible at the option of
the holder without payment of significant additional consideration into a
security described by this subdivision (a)(19);
(D) A security carrying a warrant or right to subscribe to
or purchase a security described by this subdivision (a)(19); and
(E) A certificate of interest or participation in,
temporary or interim certificate for, or receipt for a security described by
this subdivision (a)(19) that evidences an existing or contingent equity
ownership interest;
(20) “Fiduciary record” means a matter written, transcribed,
recorded, received or otherwise in the possession or control of a trust
company, whether in physical or electromagnetic form, that is necessary to
preserve information concerning an act or event relevant to an account or a
client of a trust company;
(21) “Hazardous condition” with respect to a trust company
means:
(A) A refusal by the trust company to permit examination
of its books, papers, accounts, records, or affairs by the commissioner;
(B) Violation by a trust company of a condition of its
chartering or an agreement entered into between the trust company and the
commissioner; or
(C) A circumstance or condition in which an unreasonable
risk of loss is threatened to clients or creditors of a trust company,
excluding risk of loss to a client that arises as a result of the client's
decisions or actions, but including a circumstance or condition in which a
trust company:
(i) Is unable or lacks the means to meet its current
obligations as they come due in the regular and ordinary course of business,
even though the book or fair market value of its assets may exceed its
liabilities;
(ii) Has equity capital less than the amount of
capital the trust company is required to maintain under § 23-51-110, or the
adequacy of its equity capital is threatened, as determined under regulatory
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
accounting principles;
(iii) Has concentrated an excessive or unreasonable
portion of its assets in a particular type or character of investment;
(iv) Violates or refuses to comply with this
chapter, another statute or rule applicable to trust companies, or any final
and enforceable order of the commissioner;
(v) Is in a condition that renders the continuation
of a particular business practice hazardous to its clients and creditors; or
(vi) Conducts business in an unsafe or unsound
manner, which includes, but is not limited to conducting business with:
(a) Inexperienced or inattentive management;
(b) Potentially dangerous operating practices;
(c) Infrequent or inadequate audits;
(d) Administration of assets that is notably
deficient in relation to the volume and character or responsibility for asset
holdings;
(e) Failure to adhere to sound administrative
practices;
(f) Frequent occurrences of violations of
laws, rules, or terms of the governing instruments; or
(g) Engaging in self-dealing or evidencing a
notable degree of potential or actual conflicts of interest;
(22) “Insider” means:
(A) Each director, officer or principal shareholder of the
trust company;
(B) Any company controlled by a person described by
subdivision (a)(23)(A) of this section; or
(C) Any person who participates or has authority to
participate, other than in the capacity of a director, in major policy-making
functions of the state trust company, whether or not the person has an
official title or the officer is serving without salary or compensation;
(23) “Insolvent” means a circumstance or condition in which a
state trust company:
(A) Is unable or lacks the means to meet its current
obligations as they come due in the regular and ordinary course of business,
even if the value of its assets exceeds its liabilities;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(B) Has equity capital less than one million dollars
($1,000,000), as determined under regulatory accounting principles;
(C) Fails to maintain deposit insurance with the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor if the commissioner determines
that deposit insurance is necessary for the safe and sound operation of the
state trust company, or maintains adequate security for its deposits in
accordance with § 23-51-130;
(D) Sells or attempts to sell substantially all of its
assets or merges or attempts to merge substantially all of its assets or
business with another entity other than as provided by §§ 23-51-150 — 23-51-
155; or
(E) Attempts to dissolve or liquidate other than as
provided by §§ 23-51-156 — 23-51-161;
(24) “Investment security” means a marketable obligation
evidencing indebtedness of a person in the form of a bond, note, debenture,
or other debt instrument not otherwise classified as a loan or extension of
credit;
(25) “License” means the authority granted by the commissioner
pursuant to this chapter to establish, acquire or maintain a trust office;
(26) “Loans and extensions of credit” means direct or indirect
advances of funds by a state trust company to a person that are conditioned
on the obligation of the person to repay the funds or that are repayable from
specific property pledged by or on behalf of the person;
(27) “New trust office” means a trust office located in a host
state which:
(A) Is originally established by the trust institution as
a trust office; and
(B) Does not become a trust office of the trust
institution as a result of:
(i) The acquisition of another trust institution or
trust office of another trust institution; or
(ii) A merger, consolidation, or conversion
involving any such trust institution or trust office;
(28) “Office” with respect to a trust institution means the
principal office, a trust office or a representative trust office, but not a
branch;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(29) “Officer” means the presiding officer of the board, the
principal executive officer, or another officer appointed by the board of a
state trust company or other company, or a person or group of persons acting
in a comparable capacity for the state trust company or other company;
(30) “Operating subsidiary” means a company for which a state
trust company has the ownership, ability, or power to vote, directly, acting
through one or more other persons, or otherwise indirectly, more than fifty
percent (50%) of the outstanding shares of each class of voting securities or
its equivalent of the company;
(31) “Out-of-state bank” means a bank chartered to act as a
fiduciary in any state or states other than this state;
(32) “Out-of-state trust company” means either a trust company
that is not a state trust company or a savings association whose principal
office is not located in this state;
(33) “Out-of-state trust institution” means a trust institution
that is not a state trust institution;
(34) “Person” means an individual, a company or any other legal
entity;
(35) “Principal office” with respect to:
(A) A state trust company, means a location registered
with the commissioner as the state trust company's home office at which:
(i) The state trust company does business;
(ii) The state trust company keeps its corporate
books and a set of its material records, including material fiduciary
records; and
(iii) At least one executive officer of the state
trust company maintains an office; or
(B) A trust institution other than a state trust company,
means its principal place of business in the United States;
(36) “Principal shareholder” means a person who owns or has the
ability or power to vote, directly, acting through one or more other persons,
or otherwise indirectly, ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares
of any class of voting securities of a state trust company or other company;
(37) “Private trust company” means a trust company that does not
engage in a trust business with the general public;
(38) “Receiver” means the commissioner, an agent of the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
commissioner or any federal or other governmental agency exercising the
powers and duties of a receiver pursuant to § 23-51-164;
(39) “Savings association” means a depository institution that
is neither a bank nor a foreign bank;
(40) “Shareholder” means an owner of a share in a state trust
company;
(41) “Shares” means the units into which the proprietary
interests of a state trust company are divided or subdivided by means of
classes, series, relative rights, or preferences;
(42) “State” means any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, any territory of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto
Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the
United States Virgin Islands, and the Northern Mariana Islands;
(43) “State bank” means a bank chartered to act as a fiduciary
by this state;
(44) “State trust company” means a corporation organized or
reorganized under this chapter;
(45) “State trust institution” means a trust institution having
its principal office in this state;
(46) “Subsidiary” means a company that is controlled by another
person. The term includes a subsidiary of a subsidiary;
(47) “Subsidiary trust company” means a corporation organized
under the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq. and
authorized by the commissioner pursuant to § 23-47-801 et seq. or the Bank
Holding Company Subsidiary Trust Company Formation Act of 1989, § 23-32-1901
et seq. [repealed], to conduct trust business and business incidental to
trust business in this state, of which more than fifty percent (50%) of the
voting stock is owned, directly or indirectly, by a bank holding company
which also owns, directly or indirectly, an affiliated bank, as that term is
defined in § 23-47-801 et seq.;
(48) “Surplus” means the amount by which the assets of a state
trust company exceeds its liabilities, capital, and undivided profits;
(49) “Trust business” means the holding out by a person to the
public by advertising, solicitation or other means that the person is
available to perform any service of a fiduciary in this or another state,
including but not limited to:
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(A) Acting as a fiduciary, or
(B) To the extent not acting as a fiduciary, any of the
following:
(i) Receiving for safekeeping personal property of
every description;
(ii) Acting as assignee, bailee, conservator,
custodian, escrow agent, registrar, receiver or transfer agent; or
(iii) Acting as financial advisor, investment
advisor or manager, agent or attorney-in-fact in any agreed upon capacity;
(50) “Trust company” means a state trust company, subsidiary
trust company or any other company chartered to act as a fiduciary that is
neither a depository institution nor a foreign bank;
(51) “Trust deposits” means the client funds held by a state
trust company and authorized to be deposited with itself pending investment,
distribution, or payment of debts on behalf of the client;
(52) “Trust institution” means a depository institution, state
bank or trust company;
(53) “Trust office” means an office, other than the principal
office, at which a trust institution is licensed by the commissioner to act
as a fiduciary;
(54)(A) “Unauthorized trust activity” means:
(i) A company, other than one identified in § 23-51-
165(a), acting as a fiduciary within this state;
(ii) A company engaging in a trust business in this
state at any office of the company that is not its principal office, if the
company is a state trust institution, or that is not a trust office or a
representative trust office of the company; or
(iii) An out-of-state trust institution engaging in
a trust business in this state at any time an order issued by the
commissioner under § 23-51-182 is in effect.
(B) “Unauthorized trust activity” does not include a
foundation serving as a fiduciary;
(55) “Undivided profits” means the part of equity capital of a
state trust company equal to the balance of its net profits, income, gains,
and losses since the date of its formation, minus subsequent distributions to
shareholders and transfers to surplus or capital under share dividends or
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
appropriate board resolutions. The term includes amounts allocated to
undivided profits as a result of a merger; and
(56) “Voting security” means a share, or other evidence of
proprietary interest in a state trust company or other company that has as an
attribute the right to vote or participate in the election of the board of
the state trust company or other company, regardless of whether the right is
limited to the election of fewer than all of the board members. The term
includes a security that is convertible or exchangeable into a voting
security.
(57)(A) “Foundation” means an organization that:
(i) Is organized and operated for religious,
educational, or charitable purposes, as defined in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as it existed on
January 1, 2019;
(ii) Has equity capital of at least one million
dollars ($1,000,000);
(iii) Has fiduciary liability insurance coverage
with policy limits of not less than two million dollars ($2,000,000);
(iv) Adopts and maintains written fiduciary policies
and procedures;
(v) Has an annual independent audit that covers
fiduciary activities and assets; and
(vi)(a) Is serving as a fiduciary for a trust
or estate whose assets are less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000).
(b) Subdivision (a)(57)(A)(vi)(a) of this
section does not apply if:
(1) The foundation is the sole remainder
beneficiary of the trust or estate; or
(2) The remainder beneficiary is an
organization that is supported by the foundation.
(B) “Foundation” does not include a private foundation as
defined in section 509(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §
509(a).
(b) These definitions shall be liberally construed to accomplish
the purposes of this chapter. The commissioner by rule may adopt other
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
definitions to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

23-51-103. Rules.
The Bank Commissioner may promulgate such rules as he or she determines
to be necessary or appropriate in order to implement the provisions of this
chapter.

23-51-104. Organization and powers of state trust company.
(a) Subject to the other provisions of this chapter, one or more
persons may organize and charter a state trust company. A state trust company
may perform any act as a fiduciary or engage in any trust business within or
without this state.
(b) Subject to § 23-51-111, a state trust company may exercise the
powers of an Arkansas business corporation reasonably necessary or helpful to
enable exercise of its specific powers under this chapter.
(c) A state trust company may contribute to community funds, or to
charitable, philanthropic, or benevolent instrumentalities conducive to
public welfare, amounts that its board considers appropriate and in the
interests of the state trust company.
(d) Subject to § 23-51-130, a state trust company may deposit trust
funds with itself or an affiliate.
(e) Subject to obtaining any required insurance from the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), a state trust company may receive and
pay deposits with or without interest, made by agencies of the United States
Government or of a state, county, or municipality.

23-51-105. Articles of association of state trust company.
The articles of association of a state trust company must be signed and
acknowledged by each organizer and must contain:
(1) The name of the state trust company;
(2) The period of its duration, which may be perpetual;
(3) The powers of the state trust company, which may be stated
as:
(A) All powers granted to a state trust company in this
state; or
(B) A list of the specific powers that the state trust
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
company chooses and is authorized to exercise;
(4) The aggregate number of shares that the state trust company
will be authorized to issue, the number of classes of shares, which may be
one or more, the number of shares of each class if more than one class, and a
statement of the par value of the shares of each class or that the shares are
to be without par value;
(5) If the shares are to be divided into classes, the
designation of each class and statement of the preferences, limitations, and
relative rights of the shares of each class;
(6) Any provision granting to shareholders the preemptive right
to acquire additional shares of the state trust company;
(7) Any provision granting the right of shareholders to
cumulative voting in the election of directors;
(8) The aggregate amount of consideration to be received for all
shares initially issued by the state trust company, and a statement signed
and verified by the organizers that the capital stock has been fully
subscribed and the purchase price therefor has been paid into an escrow
account approved by the Bank Commissioner;
(9) Any provision consistent with law that the organizers elect
to set forth in the articles of association for the regulation of the
internal affairs of the state trust company or that is otherwise required by
this chapter to be set forth in the articles of association;
(10) The street address of the state trust company's principal
office required to be maintained under § 23-51-172; and
(11) The number of directors or managers constituting the
initial board, which may not be fewer than three (3), and the names and
street addresses of the persons who are to serve as directors until the first
annual meeting of shareholders or until successor directors have been elected
and qualified.

23-51-106. Application for state trust company charter.
(a) An application for a state trust company charter must be made
under oath and in the form required by the Bank Commissioner and must be
supported by information, data, records, and opinions of counsel that the
commissioner requires. The application must be accompanied by a non-
refundable filing fee of not less than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) as set by rule of the commissioner
and proof of escrow of deposit for the required capital.
(b) The commissioner shall grant a state trust company charter only on
proof that one or more viable markets exist within or outside of this state
that may be served in a profitable manner by the establishment of the
proposed state trust company. In making such a determination, the
commissioner shall examine the business plan which shall be submitted as part
of the application for a state trust company charter and consider:
(1) The market or markets to be served;
(2) Whether the proposed organizational and capital structure
and amount of initial capitalization is adequate for the proposed business
and location;
(3) Whether the anticipated volume and nature of business
indicates a reasonable probability of success and profitability based on the
market sought to be served;
(4) Whether the proposed officers and directors, as a group,
have sufficient fiduciary experience, ability, standing, competence,
trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the proposed state
trust company will operate in compliance with law and that success of the
proposed state trust company is probable;
(5) Whether each principal shareholder has sufficient
experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to
justify a belief that the proposed state trust company will be free from
improper or unlawful influence or interference with respect to the state
trust company's operation in compliance with law; and
(6) Whether the organizers are acting in good faith.
(c) The failure of an applicant to furnish required information, data,
opinions of counsel, other material or the required fee is considered an
abandonment of the application.

23-51-107. Notice and investigation of charter application.
(a) The Bank Commissioner shall notify the organizers when the
application is complete and accepted for filing and all required fees and
deposits have been paid. Upon filing of an application with the commissioner,
the organizers of the proposed state trust company shall give notice of
filing through publication by one (1) insertion in a newspaper published in
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
the City of Little Rock and having a general and substantially statewide
circulation and shall give written notice of filing through the United States
mail to all trust institutions maintaining a principal office or a trust
office in the county wherein the principal office of the proposed state trust
company is to be located.
(b) At the expense of the organizers, the commissioner shall
investigate the application and inquire into the identity and character of
each proposed director, officer, and principal shareholder. The commissioner
shall prepare a written report of the investigation, and any person may
request a copy of the nonconfidential portions of the application and written
report as provided by the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et
seq. Rules adopted under this chapter may specify the confidential or
nonconfidential character of information obtained by the State Bank
Department under this section. Except as provided in rules regarding
confidential information, the financial statement of a proposed officer,
director, or principal shareholder is confidential and not subject to public
disclosure.

23-51-108. Hearing and decision on charter application.
(a) No person shall appear in opposition to the application unless the
person shall have filed a written protest to the granting of the application
within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice of the filing of the
application. The protest must state the grounds for objection and must be
accompanied by a filing fee of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000)
nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each protestant, such amount
to be set by rule promulgated by the Bank Commissioner.
(b) Once the written report of investigation has been completed, the
commissioner shall establish a time for hearing on the charter application.
(c) Notice of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing shall be
given at least thirty (30) days before the hearing as follows:
(1) By letter from the commissioner to the organizers of the
proposed state trust company and to each trust institution to which the
organizers of the application are required to give written notice pursuant to
§ 23-51-107(a);
(2) By letter from the commissioner to each person who has
notified the commissioner of an intention to oppose the application, provided
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
that if a group of persons has protested the application, the notice may be
given to one (1) member of the group; and
(3) By release to news media.
(d) If the commissioner sets a hearing, the commissioner shall conduct
a public hearing and as many prehearing conferences and opportunities for
discovery as the commissioner considers advisable and consistent with
applicable law and rules.
(e) Based on the record of any hearing conducted pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section, the commissioner shall determine whether all
of the necessary conditions set forth in § 23-51-106(b) have been established
and shall enter an order granting or denying the charter. The commissioner
may make approval of any application conditional and shall include any
conditions in the order granting the charter.

23-51-109. Issuance of charter.
(a) A state trust company may not engage in the trust business until
it receives its charter from the Bank Commissioner. The commissioner may not
deliver the charter until the state trust company has:
(1) Elected or qualified the initial officers and directors
named in the application for charter or other officers and directors approved
by the commissioner; and
(2) Complied with all other requirements of this chapter
relative to the organization of a state trust company.
(b) If a state trust company does not open and engage in the trust
business within six (6) months after the date it receives its charter or
conditional approval of application for charter, or within such further
period as such period may be extended, the commissioner shall revoke the
charter or cancel the conditional approval of application for charter without
judicial action.

23-51-110. Required capital.
(a) The Bank Commissioner may not issue a charter to a state trust
company having required capital of less than one million dollars
($1,000,000), except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The commissioner may require additional capital for a proposed or
existing state trust company or, on application in the exercise of discretion
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
consistent with protecting safety and soundness, reduce the amount of minimum
capital required for a proposed or existing state trust company, if the
commissioner finds the condition and operations of an existing state trust
company or the proposed scope or type of operations of a proposed state trust
company requires additional, or permits reduced, capital consistent with the
safety and soundness of the state trust company. The safety and soundness
factors to be considered by the commissioner in the exercise of such
discretion include but are not limited to,
(1) The nature and type of business conducted;
(2) The nature and degree of liquidity in assets held in a
corporate capacity;
(3) The amount of fiduciary assets under management;
(4) The type of fiduciary assets held and the depository of the
assets;
(5) The complexity of fiduciary duties and degree of discretion
undertaken;
(6) The competence and experience of management;
(7) The extent and adequacy of internal controls;
(8) The presence or absence of annual unqualified audits by an
independent certified public accountant;
(9) The reasonableness of business plans for retaining or
acquiring additional capital; and
(10) The existence and adequacy of insurance obtained or held by
the trust company for the purpose of protecting its clients, beneficiaries
and grantors.
(c) The proposed effective date of an order requiring an existing
state trust company to increase its capital must be stated in the order as no
sooner than twenty (20) days after the date the proposed order is mailed or
delivered. Unless the state trust company requests a hearing before the
commissioner in writing before the effective date of the proposed order, the
order becomes effective and is final and nonappealable. This subsection does
not prohibit an application to reduce capital requirements of a proposed or
an existing state trust company under subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and § 23-51-118, a state
trust company to which the commissioner issues a charter shall at all times
maintain capital in at least the amount required under subsection (a) of this
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
section, plus any additional amount or less any reduction the commissioner
directs under subsection (b) of this section.

23-51-111. Application of laws relating to general business
corporations.
(a) The Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq.,
applies to a trust company to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter
or the proper business of a trust company, except that any reference to the
Secretary of State means the Bank Commissioner unless the context requires
otherwise.
(b) Unless expressly authorized by this chapter or a rule of the
commissioner, a trust company may not take an action authorized by the
Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., regarding its
corporate status, capital structure, or a matter of corporate governance, of
the type for which the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101
et seq., would require a filing with the Secretary of State if the trust
company were a business corporation, without first submitting the filing to
the commissioner for the same purposes for which it otherwise would be
required to be submitted to the Secretary of State and compliance with the
applicable provisions of this chapter.
(c) The commissioner may adopt rules to limit or refine the
applicability of subsection (a) of this section to a trust company or to
alter or supplement the procedures and requirements of the Arkansas Business
Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., applicable to an action taken
under this chapter.

23-51-112. Commissioner hearings — Appeals.
(a) This section does not grant a right to a hearing to a person that
is not otherwise granted by governing law. A hearing before the Bank
Commissioner that is required or authorized by law may be conducted by a
hearing officer on behalf of the commissioner. A matter made confidential by
law must be considered by the commissioner in a closed hearing.
(b) The commissioner may convene a hearing to receive evidence and
argument regarding any matter before the commissioner for decision or review
under this chapter.
(c) No person shall appear in opposition to the application unless the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
person shall have filed a written protest pursuant to § 23-51-108 and paid
the applicable fee.
(d) At the hearing all organizers of the proposed state trust company
and any person making a timely written protest against the application may
appear. The attorneys for any such person may appear and be heard.
(e) The commissioner may subpoena witnesses on his or her own motion
or on the request of any party to the proceedings.
(f) The admission of evidence at the hearing shall be controlled by §
25-15-213. The parties shall have the right to cross-examine witnesses.
Official notice may be taken of judicially cognizable facts and of generally
recognized technical or scientific facts within the commissioner's
specialized knowledge. The parties may bind themselves by stipulation.
(g) The organizers shall be responsible for procuring and paying for a
verbatim record of the proceeding. It will be the duty of the organizers to
furnish at least one (1) copy of the transcript to the commissioner free of
charge.
(h) The commissioner shall render his or her decision in writing, at
or after a hearing, which decision shall include the commissioner's findings
of fact and conclusions of law.
(i)(1) The time for filing a petition for judicial review under the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., shall run from
the date the final decision of the commissioner is mailed or delivered, in
written form, to the parties desiring to appeal.
(2) The hearing of such a petition for review will be advanced
on the docket of each reviewing court as a matter of public interest.

23-51-113. Trust companies chartered under prior law.
The charter of a corporation which was previously a trust company
incorporated under any laws of this state prior to the adoption of the
Arkansas Banking Code of 1997 may be converted to a state trust company under
this chapter, if the charter, or evidence satisfactory to the Bank
Commissioner that the corporation is still in existence and in good standing,
is presented to the State Bank Department within six (6) months of enactment
of this chapter for substitution of a charter issued under this chapter.

23-51-114. Amendment of state trust company articles of association.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(a) A state trust company that has been granted a charter under § 23-
51-109 or a predecessor statute may amend or restate its articles of
association for any lawful purpose, including the creation of authorized but
unissued shares in one or more classes or series.
(b) An amendment authorizing the issuance of shares in series must
contain:
(1) The designation of each series and of any variations in the
preferences, limitations, and relative rights among series to the extent that
the preferences, limitations, and relative rights are to be established in
the articles of association; and
(2) A statement of any authority to be vested in the board to
establish series and determine the preferences, limitations, and relative
rights of each series.
(c) Amendment or restatement of the articles of association of a state
trust company and approval of the board and shareholders must be made or
obtained in accordance with provisions of the Arkansas Business Corporation
Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., for the amendment or restatement of articles
of incorporation except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules
adopted under this chapter. The original and one (1) copy of the articles of
amendment or restated articles of association must be filed with the Bank
Commissioner for approval. Unless the submission presents novel or unusual
questions, the commissioner shall approve or reject the amendment or
restatement within thirty (30) days after the date the commissioner considers
the submission informationally complete and accepted for filing. The
commissioner may require the submission of additional information as
considered necessary to an informed decision to approve or reject any
amendment or restatement or articles of association under this section.
(d) If the commissioner finds that the amendment or restatement
conforms to law and any conditions imposed by the commissioner, and any
required filing fee has been paid, the commissioner shall:
(1) Endorse the face of the original and copy with the date of
approval and the word “Approved”;
(2) File the original in the State Bank Department's records;
and
(3) Deliver a certified copy to the amendment or restatement to
the state trust company.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(e) An amendment or restatement, if approved, takes effect on the date
of approval, unless the amendment or restatement provides for a different
effective date.

23-51-115. Establishing a series of shares.
(a) If the articles of association expressly give the board authority
to establish series and determine the preferences, limitations, and relative
rights of each series of shares, the board may do so only on compliance with
this section and any rules adopted under this chapter.
(b) A series of shares may be established in the manner provided by
the provisions of the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101
et seq., as if the state trust company were a domestic corporation, but the
shares of the series may not be issued and sold except upon compliance with
this section. The state trust company shall file the original and one copy of
the articles of amendment required by the Arkansas Business Corporation Act
of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., with the Bank Commissioner. Unless the
submission presents novel or unusual questions, the commissioner shall
approve or reject the series within thirty (30) days after the date the
commissioner considers the submission informationally complete and accepted
for filing. The commissioner may require the submission of additional
information as considered necessary to an informed decision.
(c) If the commissioner finds that the interests of the clients and
creditors of the state trust company will not be adversely affected by the
series, that the series otherwise conforms to law and any conditions imposed
by the commissioner, and that any required filing fee has been paid, the
commissioner shall:
(1) Endorse the face of the original and copy of the statement
with the date of approval and the word “Approved”;
(2) File the original in the State Bank Department's records;
and
(3) Deliver a certified copy of the statement to the state trust
company.

23-51-116. Change in outstanding capital and surplus.
(a) A state trust company may not reduce or increase its outstanding
capital through dividend, redemption, issuance of shares or otherwise,
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
without the prior approval of the Bank Commissioner, except as permitted by
this section or rules adopted under this chapter.
(b) Unless otherwise restricted by rules, prior approval is not
required for an increase in capital accomplished through:
(1) Issuance of shares of common stock for cash;
(2) Declaration and payment of pro rata share dividends as
defined in the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq.;
or
(3) Adoption by the board of a resolution directing that all or
part of undivided profits be transferred to capital.
(c) Prior approval is not required for a decrease in surplus caused by
incurred losses in excess of undivided profits.

23-51-117. Capital notes or debentures.
(a) With the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, any
state trust company may, at any time, through action of its board, and
without requiring action of its shareholders, issue and sell its capital
notes or debentures, which must be subordinate to the claims of depositors
and may be subordinate to other claims, including the claims of other
creditors or classes of creditors or the shareholders.
(b) Capital notes or debentures may be convertible into shares of any
class or series. The issuance and sale of convertible capital notes or
debentures are subject to satisfaction of preemptive rights, if any, to the
extent provided by law.
(c) Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, interest
due or principal repayable on outstanding capital notes or debentures may not
be paid by a state trust company when the state trust company is in hazardous
condition or insolvent, as determined by the commissioner, or to the extent
that payment will cause the state trust company to be in hazardous condition
or insolvent.
(d) The amount of any outstanding capital notes or debentures that
meet the requirements of this section and are subordinated to unsecured
creditors of the state trust company may be included in equity capital of the
state trust company for purposes of determining hazardous condition or
insolvency, and for such other purposes as may be provided by rules adopted
under this chapter.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230

23-51-118. Private trust company.
(a) A private trust company engaging in the trust business in this
state shall comply with each and every provision of this chapter applicable
to a trust company unless expressly exempted therefrom in writing by the Bank
Commissioner pursuant to this section or by rule adopted by the commissioner.
(b) A private trust company or proposed private trust company may
request in writing that it be exempted from specified provisions of §§ 23-51-
105(11), 23-51-106(b), 23-51-107, 23-51-110(a), 23-51-122, 23-51-126(b), (c),
and (d), 23-51-127, and 23-51-128. The commissioner may grant the exemption
in whole or in part if the commissioner finds that the private trust company
does not and will not transact business with the general public. For purposes
of this section:
(1) “Transact business with the general public” means any sales,
solicitations, arrangements, agreements, or transactions to provide trust or
other business services, whether or not for a fee, commission, or any other
type of remuneration, with any client that is not a family member or a sole
proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, association, trust, estate,
business trust, or other company that is not one hundred percent (100%) owned
by one or more family members;
(2) “Family member” means any individual who is related within
the fourth degree of affinity or consanguinity to an individual or
individuals who control a private trust company or which is controlled by one
(1) or more trusts or charitable organizations established by the individual
or individuals; and
(3) All individuals who control a private trust company or
establish trusts or charitable organizations controlling the private trust
company must be related within the second degree of affinity or
consanguinity.
(c) At the expense of the private trust company, the commissioner may
examine or investigate the private trust company in connection with an
application for exemption. Unless the application presents novel or unusual
questions, the commissioner shall approve the application for exemption or
set the application for hearing not later than sixty (60) days after the date
the commissioner considers the application complete and accepted for filing.
The commissioner may require the submission of additional information as
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
considered necessary to an informed decision.
(d) Any exemption granted under this section may be made subject to
conditions or limitations imposed by the commissioner consistent with this
chapter.
(e) The commissioner may adopt rules defining other circumstances that
do not constitute transaction of business with the public, specifying the
provisions of this chapter that are subject to an exemption request, and
establishing procedures and requirements for obtaining, maintaining, or
revoking exempt status.

23-51-119. Requirements for a private trust company.
(a) Application.
(1) A private trust company requesting an exemption from the
provisions of this chapter pursuant to § 23-51-118 shall file an application
with the Bank Commissioner containing the following:
(A) A non-refundable application fee on an amount not less
than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than five thousand dollars
($5,000), as set by rules issued by the commissioner;
(B) A detailed statement under oath showing the private
trust company's assets and liabilities as of the end of the month previous to
the filing of the application;
(C) A statement under oath of the reason for requesting
the exemption;
(D) A statement under oath that the private trust company
is not currently transacting business with the public and that the company
will not conduct business with the public without the prior written
permission of the commissioner;
(E) The current street mailing address and telephone
number of the physical location in this state at which the private trust
company will maintain its books and records, together with a statement under
oath that the address given is true and correct and is not a United States
Postal Service post office box or a private mail box, postal box, or mail
drop; and
(F) Listing of the specific provisions of the chapter for
which the request for exemption is made.
(2) The commissioner shall not approve a private trust company
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
exemption unless the application is completed as required in subdivision
(a)(1) of this section.
(b) Requirements. To maintain status as an exempt private trust
company under this chapter, the private trust company shall comply with the
following:
(1) An exempt private trust company shall not transact business
with the public;
(2) An exempt private trust company shall file an annual
certification that it is maintaining the conditions and limitations of its
exempt status. This annual certification shall be filed on a form provided by
the commissioner and be accompanied by a fee set by regulations issued by the
commissioner. The annual certification shall be filed on or before June 30 of
each year. No annual certification shall be valid unless it bears an
acknowledgment stamped by the State Bank Department. The department shall
have thirty (30) days from the date of receipt to return a copy of the
acknowledged annual certification to the private trust company. The burden
shall be on the exempt private trust company to notify the department of any
failure to return an acknowledged copy of any annual certification within the
thirty-day period. The commissioner may examine or investigate the private
state trust company periodically as necessary to verify the certification;
(3) An exempt private trust company shall comply with the
principal office provisions of § 23-51-172 and with the address and telephone
requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(E) of this section;
(4) The exempt private trust company shall pay all applicable
corporate franchise taxes.
(c) Change of Control. Control of an exempt private trust company may
not be transferred or sold with exempt status. In any change of control, the
acquiring control person must comply with the provisions of this chapter and
the exempt status of the private trust company shall automatically terminate
upon the effective date of the transfer. A separate application for exempt
status must be filed if the acquiring person wishes to obtain or continue an
exemption pursuant to this section.
(d) Authority to Revoke. The commissioner shall have authority to
revoke the exempt status of a private trust company in the following
circumstances:
(1) The exempt private trust company makes a false statement
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
under oath on any document required to be filed by the chapter or by any
regulation promulgated by the commissioner;
(2) The exempt private trust company fails to submit to an
examination as required by § 23-51-184;
(3) The exempt private trust company withholds requested
information from the commissioner; or
(4) The exempt private trust company violates any provision of
this section applicable to exempt private trust companies.
(e) Notification of Revocation of Exemption. If the commissioner
determines from examination or other credible evidence that an exempt private
trust company has violated any of the requirements of this section, the
commissioner may by personal delivery or registered or certified mail, return
receipt requested, notify the exempt private trust company in writing that
the private trust company's exempt status has been revoked. The notification
must state grounds for the revocation with reasonable certainty. The notice
must state its effective date, which may not be sooner than five (5) calendar
days after the date the notification is mailed or delivered. The revocation
takes effect for the private trust company if the private trust company does
not request a hearing in writing before the effective date. After taking
effect the revocation is final and nonappealable as to that private trust
company, and the private trust company shall be subject to all of the
requirements and provisions of the chapter applicable to non-exempt state
trust companies.
(f) Compliance Period. A private trust company shall have five (5)
calendar days after the revocation is effective to comply with the provisions
of this chapter from which it was formerly exempt. If, however, the
commissioner determines, at the time of revocation, that the private trust
company has been engaging in or attempting to engage in acts intended or
designed to deceive or defraud the public, the commissioner may shorten or
eliminate, in the commissioner's sole discretion, the five (5) calendar days
compliance period.
(g) Remedies for Failure to Comply. If the private trust company does
not comply with all of the provisions of this chapter, including such
capitalization requirements as have been determined by the commissioner as
necessary to assure the safety and soundness of the private trust company,
within the prescribed time period, the commissioner may:
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(1) Institute any action or remedy prescribed by this chapter,
or any applicable rule; or
(2) Refer the private trust company to the Attorney General for
institution of a quo warranto proceeding to revoke the charter.

23-51-120. Conversion to public trust company.
(a) A private trust company may terminate its status as a private
trust company and commence transacting business with the general public. A
private trust company desiring to commence transacting business with the
general public shall file a notice on a form prescribed by the Bank
Commissioner, which shall set forth the name of the private trust company and
an acknowledgment that any exemption granted or otherwise applicable to the
private trust company pursuant to § 23-51-118 shall cease to apply on the
effective date of the notice, furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the
board authorizing the private trust company to commence transacting business
with the general public, and pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the
commissioner.
(b) The notificant may commence transacting business with the general
public thirty (30) days after the date the commissioner receives the notice,
unless the commissioner specifies another date.
(c) The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the
commissioner on determination that the written notice raises issues that
require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period
for review is extended, the notificant may commence transacting business with
the public only on prior written approval by the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner may deny approval of the notice of the private
trust company to commence transacting business with the general public if the
commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources
to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or
soundness or that the proposed transacting of business of the general public
would be contrary to the public interest or if the commissioner determines
that the notificant will not within a reasonable period be in compliance with
any provision of this chapter from which the notificant had been previously
exempted pursuant to § 23-51-118.

23-51-121. Investment in state trust company facilities — Definition.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(a) In this chapter, “state trust company facility” means real estate,
including an improvement, owned, or leased to the extent the lease or the
leasehold improvements are capitalized, by a state trust company for the
purpose of:
(1) Providing space for state trust company employees to perform
their duties and space for parking by state trust company employees and
customers;
(2) Conducting trust business, including meeting the reasonable
needs and convenience of the state trust company's customers, computer
operations, document and other item processing, maintenance and record
retention and storage;
(3) Holding, improving, and occupying as an incident to future
expansion of the state trust company's facilities; or
(4) Conducting another activity authorized by rules adopted
under this chapter.
(b) Without the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, a
state trust company may not directly or indirectly invest an amount in excess
of its capital and surplus in state trust company facilities, furniture,
fixtures, and equipment. Except as otherwise provided by rules adopted under
this chapter, in computing this limitation a state trust company:
(1) Shall include:
(A) Its direct investment in state trust company
facilities;
(B) Any investment in equity or investment securities of a
company holding title to a facility used by the state trust company for the
purposes specified by subsection (a) of this section;
(C) Any loan made by the state trust company to or on the
security of equity or investment securities issued by a company holding title
to a facility used by the state trust company; and
(D) Any indebtedness incurred on state trust company
facilities by a company:
(i) That holds title to the facility;
(ii) That is an affiliate of the state trust company;
and
(iii) In which the state trust company is invested in
the manner described by subdivision (b)(1)(B) or subdivision (b)(1)(C) of
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
this section; and
(2) May exclude an amount included under subdivisions (b)(1)(B)-
(D) of this section to the extent any lease of a facility from the company
holding title to the facility is capitalized on the books of the state trust
company.
(c) Real estate acquired under subdivision (a)(3) of this section and
not improved and occupied by the state trust company ceases to be a state
trust company facility on the third anniversary of the date of its
acquisition, unless the commissioner on application grants written approval
to further delay in the improvement and occupation of the property by the
state trust company.
(d) A state trust company shall comply with generally accepted
accounting principles, consistently applied, in accounting for its investment
in and depreciation of state trust company facilities, furniture, fixtures,
and equipment.

23-51-122. Other real estate.
(a) A state trust company may not acquire real estate except:
(1) As permitted by § 23-51-121 or as otherwise provided by this
chapter, including rules adopted under this chapter;
(2) If necessary to avoid or minimize a loss on a loan or
investment previously made in good faith; or
(3) With the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner.
(b) To the extent reasonably necessary to avoid or minimize loss on
real estate acquired as permitted by subsection (a) of this section, a state
trust company may exchange real estate for other real estate or personal
property, invest additional funds in or improve real estate acquired under
this subsection or subsection (a) of this section, or acquire additional real
estate.
(c) A state trust company shall dispose of any real estate subject to
subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section not later than:
(1) The fifth anniversary of the date:
(A) It was acquired, except as otherwise provided by rules
adopted under this chapter; or
(B) It ceases to be used as a state trust company
facility; or
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(2) The third anniversary of the date it ceases to be a state
trust company facility as provided by § 23-51-121(c).
(d) The commissioner on application may grant one (1) or more
extensions of time for disposing of real estate if the commissioner
determines that:
(1) The state trust company has made a good faith effort to
dispose of the real estate; or
(2) Disposal of the real estate would be detrimental to the
state trust company.

23-51-123. Securities.
(a) A state trust company may invest its corporate funds in any type
or character of equity or investment securities subject to the limitations
provided by this section.
(b) Unless the Bank Commissioner approves maintenance of a lesser
amount in writing, a state trust company must invest and maintain an amount
equal to not less than forty percent (40%) of the state trust company's
capital under § 23-51-110 in unencumbered cash, cash equivalents, and readily
marketable securities.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the total investment in
equity and investment securities of any one issuer, obligor, or maker, held
by the state trust company for its own account, may not exceed an amount
equal to twenty percent (20%) of the state trust company's capital base. The
commissioner may authorize investments in excess of this limitation on
written application if the commissioner concludes that:
(1) The excess investment is not prohibited by other applicable
law; and
(2) The safety and soundness of the requesting state trust
company is not adversely affected.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, a state trust
company may purchase for its own account, without limitation and subject only
to the exercise of prudent judgment:
(1) Direct obligations of the United States Government;
(2) Obligations of agencies and instrumentalities created by act
of the United States Congress and authorized thereby to issue securities or
evidences of indebtedness, regardless of guarantee of repayment by the United
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
States Government;
(3) Obligations the principal and interest of which are fully
guaranteed by the United States Government or an agency or an instrumentality
created by an act of the United States Congress and authorized thereby to
issue such a guarantee;
(4) Obligations the principal and interest of which are fully
secured, insured, or covered by commitments or agreements to purchase by the
United States Government or an agency or instrumentality created by an act of
the United States Congress and authorized thereby to issue such commitments
or agreements;
(5) General obligations of the states of the United States and
of the political subdivisions, municipalities, commonwealths, territories or
insular possessions thereof;
(6) Obligations issued by the State Board of Education under
authority of the Arkansas Constitution or applicable statutes;
(7) Warrants of political subdivisions of the State of Arkansas
and municipalities thereof having maturities not exceeding one (1) year;
(8) Prerefunded municipal bonds, the principal and interest of
which are fully secured by the principal and interest of a direct obligation
of the United States Government;
(9) The sale of federal funds with a maturity of not more than
one (1) business day;
(10) Demand, savings, or time deposits or accounts of any
depository institution chartered by the United States, any state of the
United States, or the District of Columbia, provided funds invested in such
demand, savings, or time deposits or accounts are fully insured by a federal
deposit insurance agency;
(11) Repurchase agreements that are fully collateralized by
direct obligations of the United States Government, and general obligations
of any state of the United States or any political subdivision thereof,
provided that any such repurchase agreement shall provide for the taking of
delivery of the collateral, either directly or through an authorized
custodian;
(12) Securities of, or other interest in, any open-end type
investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment
Company Act of 1940, and which is defined as a “money market fund” under 17
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
C.F.R. § 270.2a-7, provided that the portfolio of such investment company or
investment trust is limited principally to United States Government
obligations and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by United
States Government obligations, and provided further that any such investment
company or investment trust shall take delivery of the collateral either
directly or through an authorized custodian.
(e) The commissioner may adopt rules to establish limits,
requirements, or exemptions other than those specified by this section for
particular classes or categories of investment, or limit or expand investment
authority for state trust companies for particular classes or categories of
securities or other property.

23-51-124. Transactions in state trust company shares.
(a) A state trust company may acquire its own shares if:
(1) The amount of its undivided profits is sufficient to fully
absorb the acquisition of the shares under regulatory accounting principles;
and
(2) The state trust company obtains the prior written approval
of the Bank Commissioner.
(b) A state trust company shall not make loans upon the security of
its own shares.

23-51-125. Subsidiaries.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules adopted
under this chapter, a state trust company may acquire or establish a
subsidiary to conduct any activity that may lawfully be conducted through the
form of organization chosen for the subsidiary.
(b) A state trust company may not invest more than an amount equal to
twenty percent (20%) of its capital base in a single subsidiary and may not
invest an amount in excess of forty percent (40%) of its capital base in all
subsidiaries. The amount of a state trust company's investment in a
subsidiary is the total amount of the state trust company's investment in
equity or investment securities issued by its subsidiary and any loans and
extensions of credit from the state trust company to its subsidiary. The Bank
Commissioner may authorize investments in excess of these limitations on
written application if the commissioner concludes that:
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(1) The excess investment is not prohibited by other applicable
law; and
(2) The safety and soundness of the requesting state trust
company is not adversely affected.
(c) A state trust company that intends to acquire, establish, or
perform new activities through a subsidiary shall submit a letter to the
commissioner describing in detail the proposed activities of the subsidiary.
(d) The state trust company may acquire or establish a subsidiary or
begin performing new activities in an existing subsidiary thirty (30) days
after the date the commissioner receives the state trust company's letter,
unless the commissioner specifies another date. The commissioner may extend
the thirty-day period of review on a determination that the state trust
company's letter raises issues that require additional information or
additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the state
trust company may acquire or establish the subsidiary, or perform new
activities in an existing subsidiary, only on prior written approval of the
commissioner.
(e) A subsidiary of a state trust company is subject to rule by the
commissioner to the extent provided by this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter. In the absence of limiting rules, the commissioner may regulate
a subsidiary as if it were a state trust company.

23-51-126. Mutual funds.
(a) A state trust company may invest for its own account in equity
securities of an investment company registered under the Investment Company
Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq., and the Securities Act of 1933, 15
U.S.C. Sec. 77a et seq., if the portfolio of the investment company consists
wholly of investments in which the state trust company could invest directly
for its own account.
(b) If the portfolio of an investment company described in subsection
(a) of this section consists wholly of investments in which the state trust
company could invest directly without limitation under § 23-51-123(d), the
state trust company may invest in the investment company without limitation.
(c) If the portfolio of an investment company described in subsection
(a) of this section contains any investment that is subject to the limits of
§ 23-51-123(c), the state trust company may invest in the investment company
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
not more than an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the state trust
company's capital base. This provision does not apply to a money market fund.
(d) In evaluating investment limits under this chapter, a state trust
company may not be required to combine:
(1) The state trust company's pro rata share of the securities
of an issuer in the portfolio of an investment company with the state trust
company's pro rata share of the securities of that issuer held by another
investment company in which the state trust company has invested; or
(2) The state trust company's own direct investment in the
securities of an issuer with the state trust company's pro rata share of the
securities of that issuer held by each investment company in which the state
trust company has invested under this section.

23-51-127. Engaging in commerce prohibited.
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter, a state trust company may not invest its funds in trade or
commerce by buying, selling, or otherwise dealing in goods or by owning or
operating a business not part of the state trust business, except as
necessary to fulfil a fiduciary obligation to a client.

23-51-128. Lending limits.
(a) A state trust company's total outstanding loans and extensions of
credit to a person other than an insider may not exceed an amount equal to
twenty percent (20%) of the state trust company's capital base.
(b) The aggregate loans and extensions of credit outstanding at any
time to insiders of the state trust company may not exceed an amount equal to
twenty percent (20%) of the state trust company's capital base. All covered
transactions between an insider and a state trust company must be engaged in
only on terms and under circumstances, including credit standards, that are
substantially the same as those for comparable transactions with a non-
insider.
(c) The Bank Commissioner may adopt rules to administer and carry out
this section, including rules to establish limits, requirements, or
exemptions other than those specified by this section for particular classes
or categories of loans or extensions of credit, and establish collective
lending and investment limits.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(d) The commissioner may determine whether a loan or extension of
credit putatively made to a person will be attributed to another person for
purposes of this section.
(e) A state trust company may not lend trust deposits, except that a
trustee may make a loan to a beneficiary of the trust if the loan is
expressly authorized or directed by the instrument or transaction
establishing the trust.
(f) An officer, director, or employee of a state trust company who
approves or participates in the approval of a loan with actual knowledge that
the loan violates this section is jointly and severally liable to the state
trust company for the lesser of the amount by which the loan exceeded
applicable lending limits or the state trust company's actual loss and
remains liable for that amount until the loan and all prior indebtedness of
the borrower to the state trust company have been fully repaid. The state
trust company may initiate a proceeding to collect an amount due under this
subsection at any time before the date the borrower defaults on the subject
loan or any prior indebtedness or before the fourth anniversary of that date.
A person that is liable for and pays amounts to the state trust company under
this subsection is entitled to an assignment of the state trust company's
claim against the borrower to the extent of the payments. For purposes of
this subsection, an officer, director, or employee of a state trust company
is presumed to know the amount of the state trust company's lending limit
under subsection (a) of this section and the amount of the borrower's
aggregate outstanding indebtedness to the state trust company immediately
before a new loan or extension of credit to that borrower.

23-51-129. Lease financing transactions.
(a) Subject to rules adopted under this chapter, a state trust company
may become the owner and lessor of tangible personal property for lease
financing transactions on a net lease basis on the specific request and for
the use of a client. Without the written approval of the Bank Commissioner to
continue holding property acquired for leasing purposes under this
subsection, the state trust company may not hold the property more than six
(6) months after the date of expiration of the original or any extended or
renewed lease period agreed to by the client for whom the property was
acquired or by a subsequent lessee.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(b) Rental payments received by the trust company in a lease financing
transaction under this section are considered to be rent and not interest or
compensation for the use, forbearance, or detention of money. However, a
lease financing transaction is considered to be a loan or extension of credit
for purposes of § 23-51-128.

23-51-130. Trust deposit.
(a) A state trust company may deposit trust funds with itself as an
investment if authorized by the settlor or the beneficiary, provided:
(1) It maintains as security for the deposits a separate fund of
securities, legal for trust investments, under control of a federal reserve
bank or other entity approved by the Bank Commissioner, either in this state
or elsewhere;
(2) The total market value of the security is at all times at
least equal to the amount of the deposit;
(3) The separate fund is designated as such; and
(4) The separate fund is maintained under the control of another
trust institution, bank or government agency.
(b) A state trust company may make periodic withdrawals from or
additions to the securities fund required by subsection (a) of this section
as long as the required value is maintained. Income from the securities in
the fund belongs to the state trust company.
(c) Security for a deposit under this section is not required for a
deposit under subsection (a) of this section to the extent the deposit is
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor.

23-51-131. Common investment funds.
(a) A state trust company may establish common trust funds to provide
investment to itself as a fiduciary.
(b) The Bank Commissioner may adopt rules to administer and carry out
this section, including but not limited to rules to establish investment and
participation limitations, disclosure of fees, audit requirements, limit or
expand investment authority for particular classes or categories of
securities or other property, advertising, exemptions, and other requirements
that may be necessary to carry out this section.

02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-132. Borrowing limit.
Except with the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, a
state trust company may not have liabilities outstanding exceeding an amount
equal to three times its capital base.

23-51-133. Pledge of assets.
A state trust company may not pledge or create a lien on any of its
assets except to secure the repayment of money borrowed or as specifically
authorized or required by § 23-51-130, or by rules adopted under this
chapter. An act, deed, conveyance, pledge, or contract in violation of this
section is void.

23-51-134. Acquisition of control.
(a) Except as expressly otherwise permitted, a person may not without
the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner directly or indirectly
acquire control of a state trust company through a change in a legal or
beneficial interest in voting securities of a state trust company or a
corporation or other entity owning voting securities of a state trust
company.
(b) This chapter does not prohibit a person from negotiating to
acquire, but not acquiring, control of a state trust company or a person that
controls a state trust company.
(c) This section does not apply to:
(1) The acquisition of securities in connection with the
exercise of a security interest or otherwise in full or partial satisfaction
of a debt previously contracted for in good faith if the acquiring person
files written notice of acquisition with the commissioner before the person
votes the securities acquired;
(2) The acquisition of voting securities in any class or series
by a controlling person who has previously complied with and received
approval under this chapter or who was identified as a controlling person in
a prior application filed with and approved by the commissioner;
(3) An acquisition or transfer by operation of law, will, or
intestate succession if the acquiring person files written notice of
acquisition with the commissioner before the person votes the securities
acquired;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(4) A transaction exempted by the commissioner by rule or order
because the transaction is not within the purposes of this chapter or the
rule of which is not necessary or appropriate to achieve the objectives of
this chapter.

23-51-135. Application regarding acquisition of control.
(a) The proposed transferee seeking approval to acquire control of a
state trust company or a person that controls a state trust company must file
with the Bank Commissioner:
(1) An application in the form prescribed by the commissioner;
(2) The filing fee in an amount not less than one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500) and not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000),
as set by rules issued by the commissioner; and
(3) All information required by rule or that the commissioner
requires in a particular application as necessary to an informed decision to
approve or reject the proposed acquisition.
(b) If the proposed transferee includes any group of individuals or
entities acting in concert, the information required by the commissioner may
be required of each member of the group.
(c) If the proposed transferee is not an Arkansas resident, an
Arkansas company, or an out-of-state company qualified to do business in this
state, a written consent to service of process on a resident of this state in
any action or suit arising out of or connected with the proposed acquisition.
(d) The proposed transferee must give public notice of the
application, its date of filing, and the identity of each participant, in the
form specified by the commissioner, through publication by one (1) insertion
in a newspaper published in the City of Little Rock and having a general and
substantially statewide circulation, promptly after the commissioner accepts
the application as complete.

23-51-136. Hearing and decision on acquisition of control.
(a) Not later than sixty (60) days after the application is officially
filed, the Bank Commissioner may approve the application or set the
application for hearing. If the commissioner sets a hearing, the commissioner
shall conduct a hearing as he or she considers advisable and consistent with
governing statutes and rules.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(b) Based on the record, the commissioner may issue an order denying
an application if:
(1) The acquisition would substantially lessen competition, be
in restraint of trade, result in a monopoly, or be in furtherance of a
combination or conspiracy to monopolize or attempt to monopolize the trust
industry in any part of this state, unless:
(A) The anticompetitive effects of the proposed
acquisition are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the probable
effect of acquisition in meeting the convenience and needs of the community
to be served; and
(B) The proposed acquisition is not in violation of law of
this state or the United States;
(2) The financial condition of the proposed transferee, or any
member of a group composing the proposed transferee, might jeopardize the
financial stability of the state trust company being acquired;
(3) Plans or proposals to operate, liquidate, or sell the state
trust company or its assets are not in the best interests of the state trust
company;
(4) The experience, ability, standing, competence,
trustworthiness, and integrity of the proposed transferee, or any member of a
group comprising the proposed transferee, are insufficient to justify a
belief that the state trust company will be free from improper or unlawful
influence or interference with respect to the state trust company's operation
in compliance with law;
(5) The state trust company will be insolvent, in a hazardous
condition, not have adequate capitalization, or not be in compliance with the
laws of this state after the acquisition;
(6) The proposed transferee has failed to furnish all
information pertinent to the application reasonably required by the
commissioner; or
(7) The proposed transferee is not acting in good faith.
(c) If an application filed under this section is approved by the
commissioner, the transaction may be consummated. Any written commitment from
the proposed transferee offered to and accepted by the commissioner as a
condition that the application will be approved is enforceable against the
state trust company and the transferee and is considered for all purposes an
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
agreement under this chapter.

23-51-137. Appeal from adverse decision.
(a)(1) If a hearing has been held, the Bank Commissioner has entered
an order denying the application, and the order has become final, the
proposed transferee may appeal the final order by filing a petition for
judicial review under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201
et seq.
(2) The time for filing such a petition for judicial review
shall run from the date the final decision of the commissioner is mailed or
delivered, in written form, to the parties desiring to appeal.
(3) The hearing of such a petition for review will be advanced
on the docket of each reviewing court as a matter of public interest.
(b) The filing of an appeal under this section does not stay the order
of the commissioner.

23-51-138. Objection to other transfer.
This chapter may not be construed to prevent the Bank Commissioner from
investigating, commenting on, or seeking to enjoin or set aside a transfer of
voting securities that evidence a direct or indirect interest in a state
trust company, regardless of whether the transfer is included within this
chapter, if the commissioner considers the transfer to be against the public
interest.

23-51-139. Civil enforcement — Criminal penalties.
(a) The Bank Commissioner may bring any appropriate civil action
against any person who the commissioner believes has committed or is about to
commit a violation of this chapter or a rule or order of the commissioner
pertaining to this chapter.
(b) A person who knowingly fails or refuses to file the application
required by § 23-51-135 commits an offense. An offense under this subsection
is a Class A misdemeanor.

23-51-140. Voting securities held by state trust company.
(a) Voting securities of a state trust company held by the state trust
company in a fiduciary capacity under a will or trust, whether registered in
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
its own name or in the name of its nominee, may not be voted in the election
of directors or managers or on a matter affecting the compensation of
directors, managers, officers, or employees of the state trust company in
that capacity, unless:
(1) Under the terms of the will or trust, the manner in which
the voting securities are to be voted may be determined by a donor or
beneficiary of the will or trust and the donor or beneficiary actually makes
the determination in the matter at issue;
(2) The terms of the will or trust expressly direct the manner
in which the securities must be voted to the extent that no discretion is
vested in the state trust company as fiduciary; or
(3) The securities are voted solely by a co-fiduciary that is
not an affiliate of the state trust company, as if the co-fiduciary were the
sole fiduciary.
(b) Voting securities of a state trust company that cannot be voted
under this section are considered to be authorized but unissued for purposes
of determining the procedures for and results of the affected vote.

23-51-141. Bylaws.
Each state trust company shall adopt bylaws and may amend its bylaws
from time to time for the purposes and in accordance with the procedures set
forth in the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq.

23-51-142. Board of directors.
(a) The board of a state trust company shall be governed by the
provisions of the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq.,
provided that the board must consist of not fewer than three directors, the
majority of whom must be residents of this state.
(b) Unless the Bank Commissioner consents otherwise in writing, a
person may not serve as director of a state trust company if:
(1) The state trust company incurs an unreimbursed loss
attributable to a charged-off obligation of or holds a judgment against the
person or an entity that was controlled by the person at the time of funding
and at the time of default on the loan that gave rise to the judgment or
charged-off obligation;
(2) The person has been convicted of a felony; or
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(3) The person has violated a provision of this chapter,
relating to loan of trust funds and purchase or sale of trust property by the
trustee, and the violation has not been corrected.
(c) If a state trust company does not elect directors prior to sixty
(60) days after the date of its regular annual meeting, the commissioner may
commence a proceeding to appoint a receiver pursuant to § 23-51-164 to
operate the state trust company and elect directors or managers, as
appropriate. If the conservator is unable to locate or elect persons willing
and able to serve as directors, the commissioner may close the state trust
company for liquidation.
(d) A vacancy on the board that reduces the number of directors to
fewer than three must be filed not later than ninety (90) days after the date
the vacancy occurs. If the vacancy has not been filled upon the expiration of
ninety (90) days following the date the vacancy occurs, the commissioner may
commence a proceeding to appoint a receiver pursuant to § 23-51-164 to
operate the state trust company and elect a board of not fewer than three
persons to resolve the vacancy. If the conservator is unable to locate or
elect three persons willing and able to serve as directors, the commissioner
may close the state trust company for liquidation.
(e) Before each term to which a person is elected to serve as a
director of a state trust company, the person shall submit an affidavit for
filing in the minutes of the state trust company stating that the person, to
the extent applicable:
(1) Accepts the position and is not disqualified from serving in
the position;
(2) Will not violate or knowingly permit an officer, director,
or employee of the state trust company to violate any law applicable to the
conduct of business of the state trust company; and
(3) Will diligently perform the duties of the position.
(f) An advisory director is not considered a director if the advisory
director:
(1) Is not elected by the shareholders of the state trust
company;
(2) Does not vote on matters before the board or a committee of
the board and is not counted for purposes of determining a quorum of the
board or committee; and
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(3) Provides solely general policy advice to the board.

23-51-143. Officers.
The board shall annually elect the officers of the state trust company,
who serve at the pleasure of the board. The state trust company must have a
principal executive officer primarily responsible for the execution of board
policies and operation of the state trust company and an officer responsible
for the maintenance and storage of all corporate books and records of the
state trust company and for required attestation of signatures. The board may
appoint other officers of the state trust company as the board considers
necessary. The duties of any two or more officers may be combined by the
board and held by one person.

23-51-144. Certain criminal offenses.
(a) An officer, director, employee or shareholder of a state trust
company commits an offense if the person knowingly:
(1) Conceals information or a fact, or removes, destroys, or
conceals a book or record of the state trust company for the purpose of
concealing information or a fact from the Bank Commissioner or an agent of
the commissioner; or
(2) For the purpose of concealing, removes or destroys any book
or record of the state trust company that is material to a pending or
anticipated legal or administrative proceeding.
(b) An officer, director or employee of a state trust company commits
an offense if the person knowingly makes a false entry in the books or
records or in any report or statement of the state trust company.
(c) An offense under this section is a Class D felony.

23-51-145. Transactions with management and affiliates.
(a) Without the prior approval of a disinterested majority of the
board recorded in the minutes, or if a disinterested majority cannot be
obtained the prior written approval of a majority of the disinterested
directors and the Bank Commissioner, a state trust company may not directly
or indirectly:
(1) Sell or lease an asset of the state trust company to an
officer, director, or principal shareholder of the state trust company or an
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
affiliate of the state trust company;
(2) Purchase or lease an asset in which an officer, director or
principal shareholder of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state
trust company has an interest; or
(3) Subject to § 23-51-128, extend credit to an officer,
director, or principal shareholder of the state trust company or an affiliate
of the state trust company.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a lease
transaction described in subdivision (a)(2) of this section involving real
property may not be consummated, renewed, or extended without the prior
written approval of the commissioner. For purposes of this subsection only,
an affiliate of the state trust company does not include a subsidiary of the
state trust company.
(c) Subject to § 23-51-128, a state trust company may not directly or
indirectly extend credit to an employee, officer, director or principal
shareholder of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state trust
company, unless the extension of credit:
(1) Is made on substantially the same terms, including interest
rates and collateral, as those prevailing at the time for comparable
transactions by the state trust company with persons who are not employees,
officers, directors, principal shareholders, or affiliates of the state trust
company;
(2) Does not involve more than the normal risk of repayment or
present other unfavorable features; and
(3) The state trust company follows credit underwriting
procedures that are not less stringent than those applicable to comparable
transactions by the state trust company with persons who are not employees,
officers, directors, principal shareholders or affiliates of the state trust
company.
(d) An officer or director of the state trust company who knowingly
participates in or knowingly permits a violation of this section shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(e) The commissioner may adopt rules to administer and carry out this
section, including rules to establish limits, requirements, or exemptions
other than those specified by this section for particular categories of
transactions.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230

23-51-146. Fiduciary responsibility.
The board of a state trust company is responsible for the proper
exercise of fiduciary powers by the state trust company and each matter
pertinent to the exercise of fiduciary powers, including:
(1) The determination of policies;
(2) The investment and disposition of property held in a
fiduciary capacity; and
(3) The direction and review of the actions of each officer,
employee, and committee used by the state trust company in the exercise of
its fiduciary powers.

23-51-147. Recordkeeping.
A state trust company shall keep its fiduciary records separate and
distinct from other records of the state trust company. The fiduciary records
must contain all material information relative to each account as appropriate
under the circumstances.

23-51-148. Bonding requirements.
(a) The board of a state trust company shall require protection and
indemnity for clients in reasonable amounts established by rules adopted
under this chapter, against dishonesty, fraud, defalcation, forgery, theft,
and other similar insurable losses, with corporate insurance or surety
companies:
(1) Authorized to do business in this state; or
(2) Acceptable to the Bank Commissioner and otherwise lawfully
permitted to issue the coverage against those losses in this state.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by rule, coverage required under
subsection (a) of this section must include each director, officer, and
employee of the state trust company without regard to whether the person
receives salary or other compensation.
(c) A state trust company may apply to the commissioner for permission
to eliminate the bonding requirement of this section for a particular
individual. The commissioner shall approve the application if the
commissioner finds that the bonding requirement is unnecessary or burdensome.
Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions, the commissioner
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
shall approve the application or set the application for hearing not later
than sixty (60) days after the date the commissioner considers the
application complete and accepted for filing.
23-51-149. Reports of apparent crime.
A trust company that is the victim of a robbery, has a shortage of
corporate or fiduciary funds in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000), or
is the victim of an apparent or suspected misapplication of its corporate or
fiduciary funds or property in any amount by a director, officer, or employee
shall report the robbery, shortages or apparent or suspected misapplication
to the Bank Commissioner within forty-eight (48) hours after the time it is
discovered. The initial report may be oral if the report is promptly
confirmed in writing. The trust company or a director, officer, employee, or
agent is not subject to liability for defamation or another charge resulting
from information supplied in the report.

23-51-150. Merger authority.
(a) With the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, a state
trust company may merge or consolidate with a state bank to the same extent
as a state bank under the Arkansas Banking Code of 1997 or with another
person to the same extent as a business corporation under the Arkansas
Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., subject to this
chapter.
(b) Implementation of a plan of merger by a trust company and a state
bank, approval of the board, and shareholders of the parties must be made or
obtained as provided by the Arkansas Banking Code of 1997 as if the state
trust company were a state bank, except as otherwise provided by rules
adopted under this chapter.
(c) Implementation of the plan of merger with a person other than a
state bank, approval of the board and shareholders of the parties must be
made or obtained as provided by the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of
1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., as if the state trust company were a domestic
corporation and all other parties to the merger were foreign corporations and
other entities, except as otherwise provided by rules adopted under this
chapter.

23-51-151. Merger application.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(a) The original articles of merger, a number of copies of the
articles of merger equal to the number of surviving, new, and acquiring
entities, and an application in the form required by the Bank Commissioner
must be filed with the commissioner. The commissioner shall investigate the
condition of the merging parties. The commissioner may require the submission
of additional information as considered necessary to an informed decision.
(b) The commissioner may approve the merger if:
(1) Each resulting state trust company will be solvent and have
adequate capitalization for its business and location;
(2) Each resulting state trust company has in all respects
complied with the statutes and rules relative to the organization of a state
trust company;
(3) All fiduciary obligations and liabilities of each state
trust company that is a party to the merger have been properly discharged or
otherwise lawfully assumed or retained by a state trust company or other
fiduciary;
(4) Each surviving, new, or acquiring person that is not
authorized to engage in the trust business will not engage in the trust
business and has in all respects complied with the laws of this state; and
(5) All conditions imposed by the commissioner have been
satisfied or otherwise resolved.

23-51-152. Approval of commissioner.
(a) If the Bank Commissioner approves the merger and finds that all
required filing fees and investigative costs have been paid, the commissioner
shall:
(1) Endorse the face of the original and each copy with the date
of approval and the word “Approved”;
(2) File the original in the State Bank Department's records;
and
(3) Deliver a certified copy of the articles of merger to each
surviving, new, or acquiring entity.
(b) A merger is effective on the date of approval, unless the merger
agreement provides and the commissioner consents to a different effective
date.

02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-153. Rights of dissenters to mergers.
A shareholder may dissent from the merger to the extent and by
following the procedure provided by the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of
1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., or rules adopted under this chapter.

23-51-154. Authority to purchase assets of another trust institution.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, a state trust company
may purchase assets of another state trust company or trust-related assets of
another trust institution, including the right to control accounts
established with the trust institution. Except as otherwise expressly
provided by this chapter or any other applicable statutes, the purchase of
all or part of the assets of the trust institution does not make the
purchasing state trust company responsible for any liability or obligation of
the selling trust institution that is not expressly assumed by the purchasing
state trust company. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this
chapter does not govern or prohibit the purchase by a trust institution of
all or part of the assets of a corporation or other entity that is not a
trust institution.
(b) An application in the form required by the Bank Commissioner must
be filed with the commissioner for any acquisition of all or substantially
all of (i) the assets of a state trust company or (ii) the trust assets of
another trust institution by a state trust company. The commissioner shall
investigate the condition of the purchaser and seller and may require the
submission of additional information as considered necessary to make an
informed decision. The commissioner shall approve the purchase if:
(1) The acquiring state trust company will be solvent, not in a
hazardous condition and have sufficient capitalization for its business and
location;
(2) The acquiring state trust company has complied with all
applicable statutes and rules, including without limitation any applicable
requirements of §§ 23-51-178 and 23-51-179;
(3) All fiduciary obligations and liabilities of the parties
have been properly discharged or otherwise assumed by the acquiring state
trust company;
(4) All conditions imposed by the commissioner have been
satisfied or otherwise resolved; and
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(5) All fees and costs have been paid.
(c) A purchase requiring an application pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section is effective on the date of approval, unless the purchase
agreement provides for, and the commissioner consents to, a different
effective date.
(d) The acquiring state trust company shall succeed by operation of
law to all of the rights, privileges and obligations of the selling trust
institution under each account included in the assets acquired.

23-51-155. Sale of assets.
(a) The board of a state trust company, with the Bank Commissioner's
approval, may cause a state trust company to sell all or substantially all of
its assets, including the right to control accounts established with the
trust company, without shareholder approval if the commissioner finds:
(1) The interests of the state trust company's clients,
depositors, and creditors are jeopardized because of insolvency or imminent
insolvency of the state trust company;
(2) The sale is in the best interest of the state trust
company's clients and creditors; and
(3) The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor
approves the transaction unless the deposits of the state trust company are
not insured.
(b) A sale under this section must include an assumption and promise
by the buyer to pay or otherwise discharge:
(1) All of the state trust company's liabilities to clients and
depositors;
(2) All of the state trust company's liabilities for salaries of
the state trust company's employees incurred before the date of the sale;
(3) Obligations incurred by the commissioner arising out of the
supervision or sale of the state trust company; and
(4) Fees and assessments due the State Bank Department.
(c) This section does not limit the incidental power of a state trust
company to buy and sell assets in the ordinary course of business.
(d) This section does not affect the commissioner's right to take
action under any other law. The sale by a trust company of all or
substantially all of its assets with shareholder approval is deemed a
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
voluntary dissolution and liquidation and shall be governed by § 23-49-119.

23-51-156. Required vote of shareholders.
A state trust company may go into voluntary liquidation and be closed,
and may surrender its charter and franchise as a corporation of this state by
the affirmative votes of its shareholders owning a majority of its voting
stock.

23-51-157. Corporate procedure.
Shareholder action to liquidate a state trust company shall be taken at
a meeting of the shareholders duly called by resolution of the board of
directors, written notice of which, stating the purpose of the meeting, shall
be mailed to each shareholder, or in case of a shareholder's death, to the
shareholder's legal representative, addressed to the shareholder's last known
residence not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of the meeting. If
stockholders shall, by the required vote, elect to liquidate a trust company,
a certified copy of all proceedings of the meeting at which such an action
shall have been taken, attested by an officer of the trust company, shall be
transmitted to the Bank Commissioner for approval.

23-51-158. Authority to liquidate — Publication.
If the Bank Commissioner shall approve the liquidation, the
commissioner shall issue to the state trust company under the commissioner's
seal, a permit for that purpose. No such permit shall be issued by the
commissioner until the commissioner shall be satisfied that provision has
been made by the state trust company to satisfy and pay off all creditors. If
not so satisfied, the commissioner shall refuse to issue a permit, and shall
be authorized to take possession of the state trust company and its assets
and business, and hold the same and liquidate the state trust company in the
manner provided in this chapter. When the commissioner shall approve the
voluntary liquidation of a state trust company, the directors of said state
trust company shall cause to be published in a newspaper with a substantially
statewide circulation published in the City of Little Rock a notice that the
state trust company is closing down its affairs and going into liquidation,
and notify its creditors to present their claims for payment. The notice
shall be published once a week for four consecutive weeks.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230

23-51-159. Examination and reports.
When any state trust company shall be in process of voluntary
liquidation, it shall be subject to examination by the Bank Commissioner, and
shall furnish such reports from time to time as may be called for by the
commissioner.

23-51-160. Unclaimed property.
All unclaimed property remaining in the hands of a liquidated state
trust company shall be subject to the provisions of the Uniform Disposition
of Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et seq.

23-51-161. Sale or transfer of property.
Upon the approval of the Bank Commissioner, any state trust company may
sell and transfer to any other trust institution, whether state or federally
chartered, all of its assets of every kind upon such terms as may be agreed
upon and approved by the commissioner and by a majority vote of its board of
directors. A certified copy of the minutes of any meeting at which such an
action is taken, attested by an officer of the trust company, together with a
copy of the contract of sale and transfer, shall be filed with the
commissioner. Whenever voluntary liquidation shall be approved by the
commissioner or the sale and transfer of the assets of any state trust
company shall be approved by the commissioner, the charter of the state trust
company shall be canceled, subject, however, to its continued existence, as
provided by this chapter and the general law relative to corporations.

23-51-162. When commissioner may take charge.
The Bank Commissioner may forthwith take possession of the business and
property of any state trust company to which this chapter is applicable
whenever it shall appear that the state trust company:
(1) Has violated its charter or any laws applicable thereto;
(2) Is conducting its business in an unauthorized or unsafe
manner;
(3) Is in an unsafe or unsound condition to transact its
business;
(4) Has an impairment of its capital;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(5) Is in a hazardous condition;
(6) Has become otherwise insolvent;
(7) Has neglected or refused to comply with the terms of a duly
issued lawful order of the commissioner;
(8) Has refused, upon proper demand, to submit its records,
affairs, and concerns for inspection and examination of a duly appointed or
authorized examiner of the commissioner;
(9) Is employing officers who have refused to be examined upon
oath regarding its affairs; or
(10) Has made a voluntary assignment of its assets to trustees.

23-51-163. Directors may act.
Any state trust company may place its assets and business under the
control of the Bank Commissioner for liquidation by a resolution of a
majority of its directors or members upon notice to the commissioner, and,
upon taking possession of the state trust company, the commissioner, or duly
appointed agent, shall retain possession thereof until the state trust
company shall be authorized by the commissioner to resume business or until
the affairs of the state trust company shall be fully liquidated as herein
provided. No state trust company shall make any general assignment for the
benefit of its creditors except by surrendering possession of its assets to
the commissioner, as herein provided. Whenever any state trust company for
any reason shall suspend operations for any length of time, the state trust
company shall, immediately upon the suspension of operations, be deemed in
the possession of the commissioner and subject to liquidation hereunder.

23-51-164. Application of Arkansas Banking Code of 1997.
When the Bank Commissioner, or duly appointed agent, shall take
possession of any state trust company under § 23-51-162 or § 23-51-163, the
commissioner or agent shall proceed with the dissolution and liquidation of
the state trust company under the procedures established for the dissolution
and liquidation of state banks under the Arkansas Banking Code of 1997.

23-51-165. Companies authorized to act as fiduciaries.
(a) A company shall not act as a fiduciary in this state except:
(1) A state trust company;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(2) A state bank;
(3) An association organized under the laws of this state and
authorized to act as a fiduciary under § 23-37-101 et seq.;
(4) A national bank having its principal office in this state
and authorized by the United States Comptroller of the Currency to act as a
fiduciary under 12 U.S.C. § 92a;
(5) A federally chartered savings association having its
principal office in this state and authorized by its federal chartering
authority to act as a fiduciary;
(6) A subsidiary trust company authorized to act as a fiduciary
under § 23-47-801 et seq.;
(7) An out-of-state bank with a branch in this state established
or maintained under the Arkansas Interstate Banking and Branching Act, § 23-
48-901 et seq., or a trust office licensed by the Bank Commissioner under
this chapter;
(8) An out-of-state trust company with a trust office licensed
by the commissioner under this chapter; or
(9) A foundation.
(b) A company shall not engage in an unauthorized trust activity.

23-51-166. Activities not requiring a charter, etc.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a company does not
engage in the trust business or in any other business in a manner requiring a
charter or license under this chapter or in an unauthorized trust activity
by:
(1) Acting in a manner authorized by law and in the scope of
authority as an agent of a trust institution with respect to an activity
which is not an unauthorized trust activity;
(2) Rendering a service customarily performed as an attorney or
law firm in a manner approved and authorized by the Supreme Court or the laws
of this state;
(3) Acting as trustee under a deed of trust delivered only as
security for the payment of money or for the performance of another act;
(4) Receiving and distributing rents and proceeds of sale as a
licensed real estate broker on behalf of a principal in a manner authorized
by the Real Estate License Law, § 17-42-101 et seq.;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(5) Engaging in a securities transaction or providing an
investment advisory service as a licensed and registered broker-dealer,
investment advisor or registered representative thereof, provided the
activity is regulated by the State Securities Department or the United States
Securities and Exchange Commission;
(6) Engaging in the sale and administration of an insurance
product by an insurance company or agent licensed by the State Insurance
Department to the extent that the activity is regulated by the State
Insurance Department;
(7) Engaging in the lawful sale of prepaid funeral benefits
under a permit issued by the State Insurance Department under the Arkansas
Prepaid Funeral Benefits Law, § 23-40-101 et seq., or engaging in the lawful
business of maintaining a perpetual care cemetery trust pursuant to § 20-17-
904 or a permanent maintenance fund for perpetually maintained cemeteries
under the Cemetery Act for Perpetually Maintained Cemeteries, § 20-17-1001 et
seq.;
(8) Acting as trustee under a voting trust as provided by § 4-
26-706 or § 4-27-730;
(9) Engaging in other activities expressly excluded from the
application of this chapter by rules issued by the Bank Commissioner;
(10) Rendering services customarily performed by a public
accountant or a certified public accountant in a manner authorized by the
Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy;
(11) Provided the company is a trust institution and is not
barred by order of the commissioner from engaging in a trust business in this
state pursuant to § 23-51-182(b):
(A) Marketing or soliciting in this state through the
mails, telephone, any electronic means or in person with respect to acting or
proposing to act as a fiduciary outside of this state;
(B) Delivering money or other intangible assets and
receiving the same from a client or other person in this state; or
(C) Accepting or executing outside of this state a trust
of any client or otherwise acting as a fiduciary outside of this state for
any client; or
(12) If the company is a foundation, serving as a fiduciary.

02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-167. Trust business of state trust institution.
(a) A state trust institution may act as a fiduciary or otherwise
engage in a trust business in this or any other state or foreign country,
subject to complying with applicable laws of the state or foreign country, at
an office established and maintained pursuant to this chapter, at a branch or
at any other authorized location other than an office or branch.
(b) In addition, a state trust institution may conduct any activities
at any office outside this state that are permissible for a trust institution
chartered by the host state where the office is located, except to the extent
such activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any
rule or order of the Bank Commissioner applicable to the state trust
institution. Provided, however, that the commissioner may waive any such
prohibition if he or she determines, by order or rule, that the involvement
of out-of-state offices of state trust institutions in particular activities
would not threaten the safety or soundness of the state trust institutions.

23-51-168. Trust business of out-of-state trust institution.
An out-of-state trust institution which establishes or maintains one
(1) or more offices in this state under this chapter may conduct any activity
at each such office which would be authorized under the laws of this state
for a state trust institution to conduct at such an office.

23-51-169. Name of trust institution.
A state trust company or out-of-state trust institution may register
any name with the Bank Commissioner in connection with establishing a
principal office or trust office in this state pursuant to this chapter,
except that the commissioner may determine that a name proposed to be
registered is potentially misleading to the public and require the registrant
to select a name which is not potentially misleading.

23-51-170. Trust business.
A state trust company or a state bank may:
(1) Perform any act as a fiduciary;
(2) Engage in any trust business;
(3) Exercise any incidental power that is reasonably necessary
to enable it to fully exercise, according to commonly accepted fiduciary
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
customs and usages, a power conferred in this chapter; and
(4) If a state trust company, exercise any other power
authorized by § 23-51-104.

23-51-171. Branches and offices of state trust institutions.
(a) A state trust institution may act as a fiduciary and engage in a
trust business at each trust office as permitted by this chapter and at a
branch.
(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing subsection (a) of this section, a
state bank or a state trust company may not engage at an out-of-state office
in any trust business not permitted to be conducted at such an office by the
laws of the host state applicable to trust institutions chartered by the host
state.

23-51-172. State trust company principal office.
(a) Each state trust company must have and continuously maintain a
principal office in this state.
(b) Each executive officer at the principal office is an agent of the
state trust company for service of process.
(c) A state trust company may change its principal office to any
location within this state by filing a written notice with the Bank
Commissioner setting forth the name of the state trust company, the street
address of its principal office before the change, the street address to
which the principal office is to be changed, and a copy of the resolution
adopted by the board authorizing the change.
(d) The change of principal office shall take effect thirty (30) days
after the date the commissioner receives the notice pursuant to subsection
(c) of this section, unless the commissioner establishes another date or
unless prior to that day the commissioner notifies the state trust company
that it must establish to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the
relocation is consistent with the original determination made under § 23-51-
106(b) for the establishment of a state trust company at that location, in
which event the change of principal office shall take effect when approved by
the commissioner.

23-51-173. Trust office.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(a) A state trust institution may establish or acquire and maintain
trust offices anywhere in this state. A state trust institution desiring to
establish or acquire and maintain such an office shall file a written notice
with the Bank Commissioner setting forth the name of the state trust
institution, the location of the proposed additional trust office and a
general description of the surrounding area, whether the location will be
owned or leased, furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board
authorizing the additional trust office, general description of the
activities to be conducted, an estimate of the cost of the trust office and
pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner.
(b) The notificant may commence business at the additional trust
office thirty (30) days after the date the commissioner receives the notice,
unless the commissioner specifies another date.
(c) The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the
commissioner on a determination that the written notice raises issues that
require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period
of review is extended, the state trust institution may establish the
additional office only on prior written approval by the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner may deny approval of the additional office if the
commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources
to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or
soundness or that the proposed office would be contrary to the public
interest.

23-51-174. Out-of-state offices.
(a) A state bank, a state trust company, or a savings association
chartered under the laws of this state may establish and maintain a new trust
office or acquire and maintain an office in a state other than this state.
Such a trust institution desiring to establish or acquire and maintain an
office in another state under this section shall file a notice on a form
prescribed by the Bank Commissioner, which shall set forth the name of the
trust institution, the location of the proposed office, and a general
description of the surrounding area, whether the location will be owned or
leased, and whether the laws of the jurisdiction where the office will be
located permit the office to be maintained by the trust institution, furnish
a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the out-of-state
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
office, and pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner.
(b) The notificant may commence business at the additional office
thirty (30) days after the date the commissioner receives the notice, unless
the commissioner specifies another date.
(c) The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the
commissioner on a determination that the written notice raises issues that
require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period
of review is extended, the trust institution may establish the additional
office only on prior written approval by the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner may deny approval of the additional office if the
commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources
to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or
soundness or that the proposed office would be contrary to the public
interest. In acting on the notice, the commissioner shall consider the views
of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

23-51-175. Trust business at a branch or trust office.
An out-of-state trust institution may act as a fiduciary in this state
or engage in a trust business at an office in this state only if it maintains
a trust office in this state as permitted by this chapter or a branch in this
state.

23-51-176. Establishing an interstate trust office.
(a) An out-of-state trust institution that does not operate a trust
office in this state and that meets the requirements of this chapter may
establish and maintain a new trust office in this state.
(b) An out-of-state trust institution may not establish a new trust
office in this state unless a similar institution chartered under the laws of
this state to act as a fiduciary, is permitted to establish a new trust
office that may engage in activities substantially similar to those permitted
to trust offices of out-of-state trust institutions under § 23-51-175, in the
state where the out-of-state trust institution has its principal office.

23-51-177. Acquiring an interstate trust office.
(a) An out-of-state trust institution that does not operate a trust
office in this state and that meets the requirements of this chapter may
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
acquire and maintain a trust office in this state.
(b) No out-of-state trust institution may maintain a trust office in
this state unless a similar institution chartered under the laws of this
state to act as a fiduciary is permitted to acquire and maintain a trust
office through an acquisition of a trust office in the state where the out-
of-state trust institution has its principal office and may engage in
activities substantially similar to those permitted to trust offices of out-
of-state trust institutions under § 23-51-175, in the state where the out-of-
state trust institution has its principal office.

23-51-178. Requirement of notice.
An out-of-state trust institution desiring to establish and maintain a
new trust office or acquire and maintain a trust office in this state
pursuant to this chapter shall provide, or cause its home state regulator to
provide, written notice of the proposed transaction to the Bank Commissioner
on or after the date on which the out-of-state trust institution applies to
the home state regulator for approval to establish and maintain or acquire
the trust office. The filing of the notice shall be preceded or accompanied
by a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the additional
office and the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner.

23-51-179. Conditions for approval.
(a) No trust office of an out-of-state trust institution may be
acquired or established in this state under this chapter unless:
(1) The out-of-state trust institution shall have confirmed in
writing to the Bank Commissioner that for as long as it maintains a trust
office in this state, it will comply with all applicable laws of this state;
(2) The notificant shall have provided satisfactory evidence to
the commissioner of compliance with any applicable requirements of § 4-27-
1501 et seq. and the applicable requirements of its home state regulator for
acquiring or establishing and maintaining the office;
(3) The commissioner, acting within sixty (60) days after
receiving notice under § 23-51-178, shall have certified to the home state
regulator that the requirements of this chapter have been met and the notice
has been approved or, if applicable, that any conditions imposed by the
commissioner pursuant to subsection (b) of this section have been satisfied.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(b) The out-of-state trust institution may commence business at the
trust office sixty (60) days after the date the commissioner receives the
notice unless the commissioner specifies another date, provided, with respect
to an out-of-state trust institution that is not a depository institution and
for which the commissioner shall have conditioned such approval on the
satisfaction by the notificant of any requirement applicable to a state trust
company pursuant to § 23-51-106(b) or § 23-51-110, the institution shall have
satisfied such conditions and provided to the commissioner satisfactory
evidence thereof.
(c) The sixty-day period of review may be extended by the commissioner
on a determination that the written notice raises issues that require
additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of
review is extended, the out-of-state trust institution may establish the
office only on prior written approval by the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner may deny approval of the office if the
commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources
to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or
soundness or that the proposed office is contrary to the public interest. In
acting on the notice, the commissioner shall consider the views of the
appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

23-51-180. Additional trust offices.
An out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office in this
state under this chapter may establish or acquire additional trust offices or
representative trust offices in this state to the same extent that a state
trust institution may establish or acquire additional offices in this state
pursuant to the procedures for establishing or acquiring such offices set
forth in § 23-51-173.

23-51-181. Examinations — Periodic reports — Cooperative agreements —
Assessment of fees.
(a) To the extent consistent with subsection (c) of this section, the
Bank Commissioner may make such examinations of any office established and
maintained in this state pursuant to this chapter by an out-of-state trust
institution as the commissioner may deem necessary to determine whether the
office is being operated in compliance with the laws of this state and in
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
accordance with safe and sound banking practices. The provisions of the
Arkansas Banking Code of 1997 shall apply to such examinations.
(b) The commissioner may require periodic reports regarding any out-
of-state trust institution that has established and maintained an office in
this state pursuant to this chapter. The required reports shall be provided
by the trust institution or by the home state regulator. Any reporting
requirements prescribed by the commissioner under this subsection shall be
consistent with the reporting requirements applicable to state trust
companies and appropriate for the purpose of enabling the commissioner to
carry out his or her responsibilities under this chapter.
(c) The commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating, and
information-sharing agreements with any other bank supervisory agencies or
any organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more bank
supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other
supervision of any office in this state of an out-of-state trust institution,
or any office of a state trust institution in any host state, and the
commissioner may accept such a party's report of examination and report of
investigation in lieu of conducting his or her own examination or
investigation.
(d) The commissioner may enter into contracts with any bank
supervisory agency that has concurrent jurisdiction over a state trust
institution or an out-of-state trust institution maintaining an office in
this state to engage the services of the agency's examiners at a reasonable
rate of compensation, or to provide the services of the commissioner's
examiners to the agency at a reasonable rate of compensation. Any such
contract shall be deemed a sole source contract under § 19-11-232.
(e) The commissioner may enter into joint examinations or joint
enforcement actions with other bank supervisory agencies having concurrent
jurisdiction over any office established and maintained in this state by an
out-of-state trust institution or any office established and maintained by a
state trust institution in any host state, provided that the commissioner may
at any time take such actions independently if the commissioner deems such
actions to be necessary or appropriate to carry out his or her
responsibilities under this chapter or to ensure compliance with the laws of
this state, but provided further that in the case of an out-of-state trust
institution, the commissioner shall recognize the exclusive authority of the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
home state regulator over corporate governance matters and the primary
responsibility of the home state regulator with respect to safety and
soundness matters.
(f) Each out-of-state trust institution that maintains one (1) or more
offices in this state may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay supervisory
and examination fees in accordance with the laws of this state and rules of
the commissioner. The fees may be shared with other bank supervisory agencies
or any organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more bank
supervisory agencies in accordance with agreements between such parties and
the commissioner.

23-51-182. Enforcement.
(a)(1) Consistent with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq., after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Bank
Commissioner may determine:
(A) That an office maintained by an out-of-state trust
institution in this state is being operated in violation of any provision of
the laws of this state or in an unsafe and unsound manner; or
(B) That a company is engaged in an unauthorized trust
activity
(2) In either event, the commissioner shall have the authority
to take all such enforcement actions as he or she would be empowered to take
if the office or the company were a state trust company, including but not
limited to issuing an order temporarily or permanently prohibiting the
company from engaging in a trust business in this state.
(b) In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate
action, the commissioner may take any action permitted by subsection (a) of
this section without notice or opportunity for hearing, but shall promptly
afford a subsequent hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken.
The commissioner shall promptly give notice to the home state regulator of
each enforcement action taken against an out-of-state trust institution and,
to the extent practicable, shall consult and cooperate with the home state
regulator in pursuing and resolving the enforcement action.

23-51-183. Notice of subsequent merger, closing, etc.
Each out-of-state trust institution that maintains an office in this
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
state pursuant to this chapter, or the home state regulator of such a trust
institution, shall give at least thirty (30) days prior written notice or, in
the case of an emergency transaction, such shorter notice as is consistent
with applicable state or federal law, to the Bank Commissioner of:
(1) Any merger, consolidation, or other transaction that would
cause a change of control with respect to the out-of-state trust institution
or any bank holding company that controls the trust institution, with the
result that an application would be required to be filed pursuant to the
Change in Bank Control Act of 1978, as amended, 12 U.S.C. § 1817(j), or the
Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, 12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq., or
any successor statutes thereto;
(2) Any transfer of all or substantially all of the trust
accounts or trust assets of the out-of-state trust institution to another
person; or
(3) The closing or disposition of any office in this state.

23-51-184. Commissioner shall supervise and examine authorized trust
institutions.
Every authorized trust institution shall be under the supervision of
the Bank Commissioner. The commissioner shall execute and enforce through the
State Bank Department and such other agents as are now or may hereafter be
created or appointed, all laws which are now or may hereafter be enacted
relating to authorized trust institutions. For the more complete and thorough
enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner is hereby
empowered to promulgate such rules not inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter, as may, in his or her opinion, be necessary to carry out the
provisions of the laws relating to authorized trust institutions and as may
be further necessary to insure safe and conservative management of an
authorized trust institution under his or her supervision taking into
consideration the appropriate interest of the creditors, stockholders, and
the public in their relations with the authorized trust institutions. All
authorized trust institutions doing business under the provisions of this
chapter shall conduct their business in a manner consistent with all laws
relating to authorized trust institutions and all rules and instructions that
may be promulgated or issued by the commissioner.

02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-185. Examinations — Assessments.
(a) The Bank Commissioner may examine each state trust company every
twenty-four (24) months or more often as he or she determines is necessary to
safeguard the interests of the public and the safety and soundness of the
institution.
(b) Each state-chartered trust company shall pay to the State Bank
Department within ten (10) days after notice from the commissioner in January
and July of each year an assessment fee to defray the costs of examination
and the costs of operations of the department which will be charged in
accordance with an assessment fee schedule approved by the commissioner.
(c) The commissioner may accept examinations of a state trust company
by a federal or other governmental agency in lieu of an examination under
this section or may conduct examinations of a state trust company jointly or
concurrently with a federal or other governmental agency.

23-51-186. Statements of condition and income.
Each state trust company shall periodically file with the Bank
Commissioner a copy of its statement of condition and income. The
commissioner shall have the power to call for these reports whenever deemed
necessary, in order to obtain a full and complete knowledge of the condition
of the trust company.

23-51-187. Confidential records.
(a) The following records of the State Bank Department shall be
confidential and shall not be exhibited or revealed to the public except as
stated in this section or in accordance with department rules:
(1) All examination reports filed with the department;
(2) All records disclosing information obtained from
examinations;
(3) Investigations and reports revealing facts concerning a
state trust company or the customers of the organization; and
(4) All personal financial statements submitted to the
department for any purpose.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary,
records deemed confidential in accordance with this section may, in the Bank
Commissioner's discretion, be disclosed as follows:
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(1) Under a validly issued subpoena and, in the interest of
justice, the commissioner may waive the privilege created herein and produce
examination reports and other related documents under the provisions of a
protective order entered by a court or administrative tribunal of competent
jurisdiction when the order is designed to protect the confidential nature of
the information so disclosed from public dissemination;
(2) Official orders of the department may be disclosed within
the discretion of the commissioner if the commissioner makes a determination
that such a disclosure would not give advantage to a competitor or adversely
affect the safety and soundness of the state trust company; and
(3) To federal financial institutions' regulatory agencies and
financial institutions' regulatory agencies of other states.
(c) The commissioner shall have the power to promulgate rules with
regard to disclosure of confidential information.

23-51-188. Administrative orders — Penalties for violation.
(a) In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the
Bank Commissioner shall have the power to:
(1) Order any authorized trust institution, or subsidiary
thereof, or any director, officer, or employee to cease and desist violating
any provision of this chapter or any lawful rule issued thereunder;
(2) Order any authorized trust institution, or subsidiary
thereof, or any director, officer, or employee to cease and desist from a
course of conduct that is unsafe or unsound and which is likely to cause
insolvency or dissipation of assets or is likely to jeopardize or otherwise
seriously prejudice the interests of the public in their relationship with
the authorized trust institution;
(3) Order any company to cease engaging in an unauthorized trust
activity; and
(4) Enter any order pursuant to § 23-51-182.
(b) The commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation by any authorized trust
institution, or subsidiary thereof, or any director, officer, or employee of
an order issued under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. Provided further,
the commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not more than five
hundred dollars ($500) per day for each day that an authorized trust
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
institution, or subsidiary thereof, or any director, officer, or employee
violates a cease and desist order issued under subdivision (a)(2) or
subdivision (a)(3) of this section.

23-51-189. Notice and opportunity for hearing.
Consistent with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201
et seq., notice and opportunity for hearing shall be provided before any of
the foregoing actions shall be undertaken by the Bank Commissioner. Provided,
however, in cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate
action, the commissioner may take such an action, but shall promptly afford a
subsequent hearing upon application to rescind the action taken.

23-51-190. Subpoena power and examination under oath.
The Bank Commissioner shall have the power to subpoena witnesses,
compel their attendance, require the production of evidence, administer
oaths, and examine any person under oath in connection with any subject
related to a duty imposed or a power vested in the commissioner.

23-51-191. Removal of directors, officers, and employees.
Consistent with § 23-51-189, the Bank Commissioner shall have the
right, and is hereby empowered, to require the immediate removal from office
of any officer, director, or employee of any authorized trust institution who
shall be found to be dishonest, incompetent, or reckless in the management of
the affairs of the authorized trust institution or who persistently violates
the laws of this state or the lawful orders, instructions, and rules issued
by the commissioner.

23-51-192. Delegation and fiduciary responsibility.
(a) Any person acting as a trustee or as any other fiduciary under the
laws of this state may delegate any investment, management, or administrative
function if the person exercises reasonable care, judgment, and caution in:
(1) Selecting the delegate, taking into account the delegate's
financial standing and reputation;
(2) Establishing the scope and other terms of any delegation;
and
(3) Reviewing periodically the delegate's actions in order to
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
monitor overall performance and compliance with the scope and other terms of
the delegation.
(b) Notwithstanding any delegation permitted by subsection (a) of this
section, any person acting as a trustee, except as provided in § 28-73-807,
or in any other fiduciary capacity under the laws of this state shall retain
responsibility for the due performance of any delegated fiduciary function.

23-51-193. Affiliates.
(a) Any person acting as a trustee or in any other fiduciary capacity
under § 23-51-192 may hire and compensate, as a delegate, an affiliate of the
person if:
(1) Authorized by a trust or fiduciary instrument;
(2) Authorized by court order;
(3) Authorized in writing by each affected client; or
(4) The standards of § 23-51-192 are satisfied.
(b) Fees paid to an affiliate shall be competitive with fees charged
by nonaffiliates that provide substantially similar services.

23-51-194. Fee determination.
The compensation arrangement between a client and any person acting as
a trustee or as any other fiduciary pursuant to this chapter shall be at
arm's length and any compensation pursuant to such an arrangement shall be a
reasonable amount with respect to the services rendered.

23-51-195. Disclosure of potential conflicts of interest.
Any company, proposing to act as a trustee or in any other fiduciary
capacity pursuant to a written agreement to be entered into with a
prospective client after August 1, 1997, which company has any potential or
actual conflict of interest which may reasonably be expected to have an
impact on the independence or judgment of the trustee or fiduciary, shall
disclose appropriate information concerning the actual or potential conflict
of interest prior to entering into any written or oral trust or fiduciary
agreement with the client or prospective client.

23-51-196. Interests in trust institutions prohibited.
(a) Neither the Bank Commissioner nor any employee or officer of the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
State Bank Department who participates in the examination of a trust
institution, or who may be called upon to make an official decision or
determination affecting the operation of a trust institution, shall be an
officer, director, attorney, owner, or holder of stock in any state trust
company, or any company which owns or controls a state trust company, or
receive, directly or indirectly, any payment or gratuity from any such
organizations. A person subject to this section may not borrow money from a
state trust company.
(b) A person subject to this section may:
(1) Be a depositor in any trust institution that the department
regulates; and
(2) Purchase trust or fiduciary services, other than credit
services, under rates and terms generally available to other customers of the
trust institution.

23-51-197. Designation of trustee.
Any person residing in this state may designate any trust institution
to act as a fiduciary on behalf of the person.

23-51-198. Choice of law governing trusts.
Any trust institution that maintains a trust office in this state and
its affected clients may designate either this state, a state where affected
clients reside, or the state where the trust institution has its principal
office as the state whose laws shall govern any written agreement between the
trust institution and its client or any instrument under which the trust
institution acts for a client.

23-51-199. Choice of law governing fiduciary investments.
Any trust institution that maintains a trust office in this state and
its affected clients may designate either this state, a state where affected
clients reside, or the state where the trust institution has its principal
office as the state whose laws shall govern with respect to the fiduciary
investment standards applicable to any written agreement between the trust
institution or its client and any other instrument under which the trust
institution acts for a client.

02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-200 — 23-51-211. [Repealed.]

CHAPTER 51
ARKANSAS TRUST INSTITUTIONS ACT OF 2025

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

23-51-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known as and may be cited as the "Arkansas Trust
Institutions Act of 2025".

23-51-102. Administration.
(a)(1) This chapter shall be administered by the Bank Commissioner,
and every authorized trust institution shall be under the supervision of the
commissioner.
(2) The commissioner shall execute and enforce through the State
Bank Department or other agents all laws relating to authorized trust
institutions.
(3) The commissioner may promulgate rules as he or she
determines to be necessary or appropriate to implement this chapter.
(b) The commissioner may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance,
require the production of evidence, administer oaths, and examine a person
under oath in connection with any subject related to a duty imposed or a
power vested in the commissioner.
(c)(1)(A) The commissioner or an employee or officer of the department
who participates in the examination of a trust institution, or who may be
called upon to make an official decision or determination affecting the
operation of a trust institution, shall not be an officer, director,
attorney, owner, or holder of stock in a state trust company, or a company
that owns or controls a state trust company, or receive, directly or
indirectly, a payment or gratuity from a trust institution, state trust
company, or company controlling a trust company.
(B) A person subject to this section shall not borrow
money from a state trust company.
(2) A person subject to this section may:
(A) Be a depositor in a trust institution that the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
department regulates; and
(B) Purchase trust or fiduciary services, other than
credit services, under rates and terms generally available to other customers
of the trust institution.

23-51-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Account" means a client relationship established with a
trust company involving the transfer of funds or property to the trust
company, including a relationship in which the trust company acts as trustee,
executor, administrator, guardian, custodian, conservator, bailee, receiver,
registrar, or agent, but excluding a relationship in which the trust company
acts solely in an advisory capacity;
(2) "Act as a fiduciary" means to:
(A) Accept or execute trusts, including to:
(i) Act as trustee under a written agreement;
(ii) Receive money or other property in the
fiduciary's capacity as trustee for investment in real or personal property;
(iii) Act as trustee and perform the fiduciary
duties committed or transferred to the fiduciary by order of a court of
competent jurisdiction;
(iv) Act as trustee of the estate of a deceased
person;
(v) Act as trustee for a minor or incapacitated
person; or
(vi) Conduct trust business as defined in this
section;
(B) Administer in any other fiduciary capacity real or
tangible personal property; or
(C) Act pursuant to an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction as executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased person
or as a guardian or conservator for a minor or incapacitated person;
(3) "Administer" means, with respect to real or tangible
personal property and as an agent or in another representative capacity, to
possess, purchase, sell, lease or insure, safekeep, or otherwise manage the
property;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(4) "Affiliate" means a company that directly or indirectly
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a trust
institution or other company;
(5) "Authorized trust institution" means a state trust company,
subsidiary trust company, or trust office or representative trust office of a
trust institution located in Arkansas;
(6) "Bank" means a state bank, national bank, a bank chartered
by any state of the United States, or a foreign bank organized under the laws
of a territory of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam,
American Samoa, or the United States Virgin Islands, the deposits of which
are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;
(7) "Bank supervisory agency" means:
(A) An agency of another state with primary responsibility
for chartering and supervising a trust institution; and
(B) The United States Office of the Comptroller of the
Currency, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Board of Governors
of the Federal Reserve System, and any successor to these agencies;
(8) "Branch" means the same as defined in § 23-48-702 with
respect to a depository institution;
(9) "Capital" means:
(A) The sum of:
(i) The par value of all shares of the state trust
company having a par value that have been issued;
(ii) The consideration fixed by the board in the
manner provided by the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq.,
for all shares of the state trust company without par value that have been
issued, except a part of that consideration that:
(a) Has been actually received;
(b) Is less than all of that consideration;
and
(c) The board, by resolution adopted not later
than sixty (60) days after the date of issuance of those shares, has
allocated to surplus with the prior approval of the Bank Commissioner; and
(iii) An amount not included in subdivisions
(a)(9)(A)(i) and (ii) of this section that has been transferred to capital of
the state trust company, on the payment of a share dividend or on adoption by
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
the board of a resolution directing that all or part of surplus be
transferred to capital, minus each reduction made as permitted by law; less
(B) All amounts otherwise included in subdivisions
(a)(9)(A)(i) and (ii) of this section that are attributable to the issuance
of securities by the state trust company and that the commissioner
determines, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, should be classified
as debt rather than equity securities;
(10) "Capital base" means the sum of capital, surplus, and
undivided profits, plus any additions and less any subtractions that the
commissioner may by rule prescribe;
(11) "Charter" means a charter, license, or other authority
issued by the commissioner or a bank supervisory agency authorizing a trust
institution to act as a fiduciary in its home state;
(12)(A) "Client" means a person to whom a trust institution owes
a duty or obligation under a trust or other account administered by the trust
institution or as an advisor or agent, whether or not the trust institution
owes a fiduciary duty to the person.
(B) "Client" includes the noncontingent beneficiaries of
an account;
(13) "Company" means a bank, trust company, subsidiary trust
company, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association,
business trust, foundation, or another trust;
(14) "Control" means:
(A) The ownership of or ability or power to vote,
directly, acting through one (1) or more other persons, or otherwise
indirectly, more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding shares of
a class of voting securities of a state trust company or other company;
(B) The ability to control the election of a majority of
the board of a state trust company or other company; and
(C) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a
controlling influence over the management or policies of the state trust
company or other company as determined by the commissioner after notice and
an opportunity for hearing;
(15) "Depository institution" means a company chartered to act
as a fiduciary and included for any purpose within any of the definitions of
“insured depository institution” as stated in 12 U.S.C. § 1813, as it existed
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
on January 1, 2025;
(16) "Equity capital" means an amount by which the total assets
of a state trust company exceed the total liabilities of the state trust
company;
(17) "Equity security" means:
(A) Stock, other than adjustable rate preferred stock and
money market, including auction rate, preferred stock;
(B) A certificate of interest or participation in a
profit-sharing agreement, collateral-trust certificate, preorganization
certificate or subscription, transferable share or participation share,
investment contract, voting-trust certificate, or partnership interest;
(C) A security immediately convertible at the option of
the holder without payment of significant additional consideration into a
security described by this subdivision (17);
(D) A security carrying a warrant or right to subscribe to
or purchase a security described by this subdivision (17); and
(E) A certificate of interest or participation in,
temporary or interim certificate for, or receipt for a security described by
this subdivision (17) that evidences an existing or contingent equity
ownership interest;
(18) "Fiduciary record" means a matter written, transcribed,
recorded, received, or otherwise in the possession or control of a trust
company, whether in physical or electromagnetic form, that is necessary to
preserve information concerning an act or event relevant to an account or a
client of a trust company;
(19)(A) "Foundation" means an organization that:
(i) Is organized and operated for religious,
educational, or charitable purposes, as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as
it existed on January 1, 2025;
(ii) Has equity capital of at least one million
dollars ($1,000,000);
(iii) Has fiduciary liability insurance coverage
with policy limits of not less than two million dollars ($2,000,000);
(iv) Adopts and maintains written fiduciary policies
and procedures;
(v) Has an annual independent audit that covers
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
fiduciary activities and assets; and
(vi)(a) Is serving as a fiduciary for a trust or
estate whose assets are less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000).
(b) Subdivision (19)(A)(vi)(a) of this section
does not apply if:
(1) The foundation is the sole remainder
beneficiary of the trust or estate; or
(2) The remainder beneficiary is an
organization that is supported by the foundation.
(B) "Foundation" does not include a private foundation as
defined in 26 U.S.C. § 509(a), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(20) "Hazardous condition" means, with respect to a trust
company:
(A) A refusal by the trust company to permit examination
of its books, papers, accounts, records, or affairs by the commissioner;
(B) Violation by a trust company of a condition of its
chartering or an agreement entered into between the trust company and the
commissioner; or
(C) A circumstance or condition in which an unreasonable
risk of loss is threatened to clients or creditors of a trust company,
excluding risk of loss to a client that arises as a result of the client's
decisions or actions, but including a circumstance or condition in which a
trust company:
(i) Is unable or lacks the means to meet its current
obligations as they come due in the regular and ordinary course of business,
even though the book or fair market value of its assets may exceed its
liabilities;
(ii) Has equity capital less than the amount of
capital the trust company is required to maintain under § 23-51-403, or the
adequacy of its equity capital is threatened, as determined under regulatory
accounting principles;
(iii) Has concentrated an excessive or unreasonable
portion of its assets in a particular type or character of investment;
(iv) Violates or refuses to comply with this
chapter, another statute or rule applicable to trust companies, or a final
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
and enforceable order of the commissioner;
(v) Is in a condition that renders the continuation
of a particular business practice hazardous to its clients and creditors; or
(vi) Conducts business in an unsafe or unsound
manner, which includes without limitation conducting business with:
(a) Inexperienced or inattentive management;
(b) Potentially dangerous operating practices;
(c) Infrequent or inadequate audits;
(d) Administration of assets that is notably
deficient in relation to the volume and character or responsibility for asset
holdings;
(e) Failure to adhere to sound administrative
practices;
(f) Frequent occurrences of violations of
laws, rules, or terms of the governing instruments; or
(g) Engaging in self-dealing or evidencing a
notable degree of potential or actual conflicts of interest;
(21) "Insider" means:
(A) A director, officer, or principal shareholder of the
trust company;
(B) A company controlled by a person described by
subdivision (21)(A) of this section; or
(C) A person who participates or has authority to
participate, other than in the capacity of a director, in major policy-making
functions of the state trust company, whether or not the person has an
official title or the officer is serving without salary or compensation;
(22) "Insolvent" means a circumstance or condition in which a
state trust company:
(A) Is unable or lacks the means to meet its current
obligations as they come due in the regular and ordinary course of business,
even if the value of its assets exceeds its liabilities;
(B) Has equity capital less than one million dollars
($1,000,000), as determined under regulatory accounting principles;
(C) Fails to maintain deposit insurance with the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor if the commissioner determines
that deposit insurance is necessary for the safe and sound operation of the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
state trust company, or fails to maintain adequate security for its deposits
according to § 23-51-508;
(D) Sells or attempts to sell substantially all of its
assets or merges or attempts to merge substantially all of its assets or
business with another entity other than as provided by §§ 23-51-701 — 23-51-
706; or
(E) Attempts to dissolve or liquidate other than as
provided by § 23-51-1001;
(23) "Investment security" means a marketable obligation
evidencing indebtedness of a person in the form of a bond, note, debenture,
or other debt instrument not otherwise classified as a loan or extension of
credit;
(24) "License" means the authority granted by the commissioner
under this chapter to establish, acquire, or maintain a trust office;
(25) "Loans and extensions of credit" means direct or indirect
advances of funds by a state trust company to a person that are conditioned
on the obligation of the person to repay the funds or that are repayable from
specific property pledged by or on behalf of the person;
(26) "New trust office" means a trust office located in a host
state that:
(A) Is originally established by the trust institution as
a trust office; and
(B) Does not become a trust office of the trust
institution as a result of:
(i) The acquisition of another trust institution or
trust office of another trust institution; or
(ii) A merger, consolidation, or conversion
involving any trust institution or trust office;
(27)(A) "Office" means, with respect to a trust institution, a
physical location including the principal office, a trust office, or a
representative trust office.
(B) "Office" does not include a branch;
(28) "Officer" means the presiding officer of a board, a
principal executive officer, or another officer appointed by the board of a
state trust company or other company, or a person or group of persons acting
in a comparable capacity for the state trust company or other company;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(29) "Out-of-state bank" means a bank chartered to act as a
fiduciary in any state or states other than this state;
(30) "Out-of-state trust company" means either a trust company
that is not a state trust company or a savings association whose principal
office is not located in this state;
(31) "Out-of-state trust institution" means a trust institution
that is not a state trust institution;
(32) "Person" means an individual, a company, or any other legal
entity;
(33) "Principal office" with respect to:
(A) A state trust company, means a location registered
with the commissioner as the state trust company's home office at which:
(i) The state trust company does business;
(ii) The state trust company keeps its corporate
books and a set of its material records, including material fiduciary
records; and
(iii) At least one (1) executive officer of the
state trust company maintains an office; or
(B) A trust institution other than a state trust company,
means its principal place of business in the United States;
(34) "Principal shareholder" means a person who owns or has the
ability or power to vote, directly, acting through one (1) or more other
persons, or otherwise indirectly, ten percent (10%) or more of the
outstanding shares of any class of voting securities of a state trust company
or other company;
(35) "Private trust company" means a trust company that does not
engage in a trust business with the general public;
(36) "Receiver" means the commissioner, an agent of the
commissioner, or any federal or other governmental agency exercising the
powers and duties of a receiver under § 23-51-1003;
(37) "Representative trust office" means an office at which a
trust institution has been authorized by the commissioner to engage in a
trust business other than acting as a fiduciary;
(38) "Savings association" means a depository institution that
is neither a bank nor a foreign bank;
(39) "Shareholder" means an owner of a share in a state trust
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
company;
(40) "Shares" means the units into which the proprietary
interests of a state trust company are divided or subdivided by means of
classes, series, relative rights, or preferences;
(41) "State" means any state of the United States, the District
of Columbia, any territory of the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto
Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the
United States Virgin Islands, and the Northern Mariana Islands;
(42) "State bank" means a bank chartered to act as a fiduciary
by this state;
(43) "State trust company" means a corporation organized or
reorganized under this chapter;
(44) "State trust company facility" means real estate, including
an improvement, owned, or leased to the extent the lease or the leasehold
improvements are capitalized, by a state trust company for the purpose of:
(A) Providing space for state trust company employees to
perform their duties and space for parking by state trust company employees
and customers;
(B) Conducting trust business, including meeting the
reasonable needs and convenience of the state trust company's customers,
computer operations, document and other item processing, maintenance and
record retention, and storage;
(C) Holding, improving, and occupying as an incident to
future expansion of the state trust company's facilities; or
(D) Conducting another activity authorized by rules
adopted under this chapter;
(45) "State trust institution" means a trust institution having
its principal office in this state;
(46)(A) "Subsidiary" means a company that is controlled by
another person.
(B) "Subsidiary" includes a subsidiary of a subsidiary;
(47) "Subsidiary trust company" means a corporation organized
under the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., and
authorized by the commissioner pursuant to § 23-47-801 et seq., to conduct
trust business and business incidental to trust business in this state, of
which more than fifty percent (50%) of the voting stock is owned, directly or
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
indirectly, by a bank holding company which also owns, directly or
indirectly, an affiliated bank, as that term is defined in § 23-47-801 et
seq.;
(48) "Surplus" means the amount by which the assets of a state
trust company exceeds its liabilities, capital, and undivided profits;
(49) "Trust business" means the holding out by a person to the
public by advertising, solicitation, or other means that the person is
available to perform any service of a fiduciary in this or another state,
including without limitation:
(A) Acting as a fiduciary; or
(B) To the extent not acting as a fiduciary, any of the
following:
(i) Receiving for safekeeping personal property of
every description;
(ii) Acting as assignee, bailee, conservator,
custodian, escrow agent, registrar, receiver, or transfer agent; or
(iii) Acting as financial advisor, investment
advisor or manager, agent, or attorney-in-fact in any agreed-upon capacity;
(50) "Trust company" means a state trust company, subsidiary
trust company, or any other company chartered to act as a fiduciary that is
neither a depository institution nor a foreign bank;
(51) "Trust deposits" means the client funds held by a state
trust company and authorized to be deposited with itself pending investment,
distribution, or payment of debts on behalf of the client;
(52) "Trust institution" means a depository institution, state
bank, or trust company;
(53) "Trust office" means a physical office, other than the
principal office, at which a trust institution is licensed by the
commissioner to act as a fiduciary;
(54)(A) "Unauthorized trust activity" means:
(i) A company, other than one identified in § 23-51-
103, acting as a fiduciary within this state;
(ii) A company engaging in a trust business in this
state at any office of the company that is not its principal office, if the
company is a state trust institution, or that is not a trust office or a
representative trust office of the company; or
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(iii) An out-of-state trust institution engaging in
a trust business in this state at any time under an order issued by the
commissioner under § 23-51-301 is in effect.
(B) "Unauthorized trust activity" does not include a
foundation serving as a fiduciary;
(55)(A) "Undivided profits" means the part of equity capital of
a state trust company equal to the balance of its net profits, income, gains,
and losses since the date of its formation, minus subsequent distributions to
shareholders and transfers to surplus or capital under share dividends or
appropriate board resolutions.
(B) "Undivided profits" includes amounts allocated to
undivided profits as a result of a merger; and
(56)(A) "Voting security" means a share, or other evidence of
proprietary interest in a state trust company or other company that has as an
attribute the right to vote or participate in the election of the board of
the state trust company or other company, whether or not the right is limited
to the election of fewer than all of the board members.
(B) "Voting security" includes a security that is
convertible or exchangeable into a voting security.

23-51-104. Company authorized to act as fiduciary.
(a) A company shall not act as a fiduciary in this state except:
(1) A state trust company;
(2) A state bank;
(3) An association organized under the laws of this state and
authorized to act as a fiduciary under § 23-37-101 et seq.;
(4) A national bank having its principal office in this state
and authorized by the United States Comptroller of the Currency to act as a
fiduciary under 12 U.S.C. § 92a, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) A federally chartered savings association having its
principal office in this state and authorized by its federal chartering
authority to act as a fiduciary;
(6) A subsidiary trust company authorized to act as a fiduciary
under § 23-47-801 et seq.;
(7) An out-of-state bank with a branch in this state established
or maintained under § 23-48-901 et seq., or a trust office licensed by the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
Bank Commissioner under this chapter;
(8) An out-of-state trust company with a trust office or a trust
representative office licensed by the commissioner under this chapter; or
(9) A foundation.
(b) A company shall not engage in an unauthorized trust activity.

23-51-105. Trust business.
A state trust company or a state bank may:
(1) Perform any act as a fiduciary;
(2) Engage in any trust business;
(3) Exercise any incidental power that is reasonably necessary
to enable it to fully exercise, according to commonly accepted fiduciary
customs and usages, a power conferred in this chapter; and
(4) If a state trust company, exercise any other power
authorized by § 23-51-401.

23-51-106. Activities not requiring charter or license.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a company does not
engage in the trust business or in any other business in a manner requiring a
charter or license under this chapter or in an unauthorized trust activity
by:
(1) Acting in a manner authorized by law and in the scope of
authority as an agent of a trust institution with respect to an activity that
is not an unauthorized trust activity;
(2) Rendering a service customarily performed as an attorney or
law firm in a manner approved and authorized by the Supreme Court or the laws
of this state;
(3) Acting as trustee under a deed of trust delivered only as
security for the payment of money or for the performance of another act;
(4) Receiving and distributing rents and proceeds of sale as a
licensed real estate broker on behalf of a principal in a manner authorized
by the Real Estate License Law, § 17-42-101 et seq.;
(5) Engaging in a securities transaction or providing an
investment advisory service as a licensed and registered broker-dealer,
investment advisor or registered representative thereof, provided the
activity is regulated by the State Securities Department or the United States
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
Securities and Exchange Commission;
(6) Engaging in the sale and administration of an insurance
product by an insurance company or agent licensed by the State Insurance
Department to the extent that the activity is regulated by the State
Insurance Department;
(7) Engaging in the lawful sale of prepaid funeral benefits
under a permit issued by the State Insurance Department under the Arkansas
Prepaid Funeral Benefits Law, § 23-40-101 et seq., or engaging in the lawful
business of maintaining a perpetual care cemetery trust pursuant to § 20-17-
904 or a permanent maintenance fund for perpetually maintained cemeteries
under the Cemetery Act for Perpetually Maintained Cemeteries, § 20-17-1001 et
seq.;
(8) Acting as trustee under a voting trust as provided by § 4-
26-706 or § 4-27-730;
(9) Engaging in other activities expressly excluded from the
application of this chapter by rules issued by the Bank Commissioner;
(10) Rendering services customarily performed by a public
accountant or a certified public accountant in a manner authorized by the
Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy;
(11) If the company is a trust institution and is not barred by
order of the commissioner from engaging in a trust business in this state
under this chapter:
(A) Marketing or soliciting in this state through the
mails, telephone, any electronic means, or in person with respect to acting
or proposing to act as a fiduciary outside of this state;
(B) Delivering money or other intangible assets and
receiving the same from a client or other person in this state; or
(C) Accepting or executing outside of this state a trust
of a client or otherwise acting as a fiduciary outside of this state for a
client; or
(12) If the company is a foundation, serving as a fiduciary.

23-51-107. Trust business of state trust institution.
(a) A state trust institution may act as a fiduciary or otherwise
engage in a trust business in this or any other state or foreign country,
subject to complying with applicable laws of the state or foreign country,
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
at:
(1) An office established and maintained under this chapter;
(2) A branch; or
(3) Any other authorized location other than an office or
branch.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a
state trust institution may conduct any activities at an office outside this
state that are permissible for a trust institution chartered by the host
state where the office is located, except to the extent the activities are
expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any rule or order of the
Bank Commissioner applicable to the state trust institution.
(2) The commissioner may waive any prohibition if he or she
determines, by order or rule, that the involvement of out-of-state offices of
state trust institutions in particular activities would not threaten the
safety or soundness of the state trust institutions.

23-51-108. Trust charters under prior law.
A charter of a corporation that was previously a state trust company
incorporated under any laws of this state before the effective date of this
act shall continue to be effective and shall operate according to this
chapter and other applicable law.

23-51-109. Application of laws relating to general business
corporations.
(a) The Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., applies
to a trust company to the extent not inconsistent with this chapter or the
proper business of a trust company, except that a reference to the Secretary
of State under the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq.,
means the Bank Commissioner unless the context requires otherwise.
(b) Unless expressly authorized by this chapter or a rule of the
commissioner, a trust company shall not take an action authorized by the
Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., regarding its
corporate status, capital structure, or a matter of corporate governance, of
the type for which the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq.,
would require a filing with the Secretary of State if the trust company were
a business corporation, without first submitting the filing to the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
commissioner for the same purposes for which it otherwise would be required
to be submitted to the Secretary of State and compliance with this chapter.
(c) The commissioner may adopt rules to limit or refine the
applicability of subsection (a) of this section to a trust company or to
alter or supplement the procedures and requirements of the Arkansas Business
Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., applicable to an action taken under this
chapter.

23-51-110. Engaging in commerce prohibited.
Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules adopted under
this chapter, a state trust company shall not invest its funds in trade or
commerce by buying, selling, or otherwise dealing in goods or by owning or
operating a business not part of the state trust business, except as
necessary to fulfill a fiduciary obligation to a client.

23-51-111. Name of trust institution.
(a) Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, a state
trust company or out-of-state trust institution may register a name with the
Bank Commissioner in connection with establishing a principal office, trust
office, or representative trust office in this state under this chapter.
(b) The commissioner may determine that a name proposed to be
registered is potentially misleading to the public and require the registrant
to select a name that is not potentially misleading.

23-51-112. Confidential records.
(a) The following records of the State Bank Department shall be
confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act, § 25-19-101 et seq. except as stated in this section or
according to department rules:
(1) An examination report filed with the department;
(2) A record disclosing information obtained from an
examination;
(3) Investigations and reports revealing facts concerning a
state trust company or the customers of the organization; and
(4) Any personal financial statements submitted to the
department.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary,
records deemed confidential according to this section, in the Bank
Commissioner's discretion, may be disclosed as follows:
(1) Under a validly issued subpoena and, in the interest of
justice, the commissioner may waive the privilege created under this section
and produce examination reports and other related documents under the
provisions of a protective order entered by a court or administrative
tribunal of competent jurisdiction when the order is designed to protect the
confidential nature of the information that is disclosed from public
dissemination;
(2) An official order of the department may be disclosed within
the discretion of the commissioner if the commissioner makes a determination
that the disclosure would not give advantage to a competitor or adversely
affect the safety and soundness of the state trust company; and
(3) To federal financial institutions' regulatory agencies and
financial institutions' regulatory agencies of other states.
(c) The commissioner may promulgate rules about disclosure of
confidential information.

Subchapter 2 — Supervision

23-51-201. Examination of state trust companies.
(a) The Bank Commissioner shall examine a state trust company at least
one (1) time every twenty-four (24) months or more often as the commissioner
determines is necessary to safeguard the interests of the public and the
safety and soundness of the institution.
(b) A state trust company shall pay to the State Bank Department
within ten (10) days after notice from the commissioner in January and July
of each year an assessment fee to defray the costs of examination and the
costs of operations of the department which will be charged according to an
assessment fee schedule approved by the commissioner.
(c) The commissioner may:
(1) Accept examinations of a state trust company by a bank
supervisory agency in lieu of an examination under this section; or
(2) Conduct examinations of a state trust company jointly or
concurrently with a bank supervisory agency.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(d)(1) A state trust company shall periodically file with the
commissioner a copy of its statement of condition and income.
(2) The commissioner may call for a report under subdivision
(d)(1) of this section whenever deemed necessary, to obtain a full and
complete knowledge of the condition of the state trust company.

23-51-202. Examination of out-of-state trust institutions.
(a)(1) To the extent consistent with § 23-51-203, the Bank
Commissioner may make an examination of an office established and maintained
in this state under this chapter by an out-of-state trust institution as the
commissioner may deem necessary to determine whether the office is being
operated in compliance with the laws of this state and according to safe and
sound banking practices.
(2) The Arkansas Banking Code of 1997, § 23-45-101 et seq.,
applies to an examination under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(b)(1) The commissioner may require a periodic report regarding an
out-of-state trust institution that has established and maintained an office
in this state under this chapter.
(2) The periodic report required under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section shall be provided by the trust institution or by the home state
regulator.
(3) A reporting requirement prescribed by the commissioner under
this subsection shall be consistent with the reporting requirements
applicable to state trust companies and appropriate for the purpose of
enabling the commissioner to carry out his or her responsibilities under this
chapter.

23-51-203. Cooperative agreements.
(a)(1) The Bank Commissioner may enter into cooperative, coordinating,
and information-sharing agreements with any other bank supervisory agencies
or any organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more bank
supervisory agencies with respect to the periodic examination or other
supervision of an office in this state of an out-of-state trust institution
or an office of a state trust institution in a host state.
(2) The commissioner may accept a party's report of examination
and report of investigation in lieu of conducting his or her own examination
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
or investigation.
(b)(1) The commissioner may contract with a bank supervisory agency
that has concurrent jurisdiction over a state trust institution or an out-of-
state trust institution maintaining an office in this state to engage the
services of the bank supervisory agency's examiners at a reasonable rate of
compensation, or to provide the services of the commissioner's examiners to
the bank supervisory agency at a reasonable rate of compensation.
(2) A contract under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be
deemed a sole source contract under § 19-11-232.
(c) The commissioner may enter into joint examinations or joint
enforcement actions with other bank supervisory agencies having concurrent
jurisdiction over an office established and maintained in this state by an
out-of-state trust institution or an office established and maintained by a
state trust institution in any host state, if:
(1) The commissioner may at any time take action independently
if the commissioner deems the action to be necessary or appropriate to carry
out his or her responsibilities under this chapter or to ensure compliance
with the laws of this state; or
(2) In the case of an out-of-state trust institution, the
commissioner recognizes the exclusive authority of the home state regulator
over corporate governance matters and the primary responsibility of the home
state regulator with respect to safety and soundness matters.
(d)(1) An out-of-state trust institution that maintains at least one
(1) office in this state may be assessed and, if assessed, shall pay
supervisory and examination fees according to the laws of this state and
rules of the commissioner.
(2) The fees may be shared with other bank supervisory agencies
or an organization affiliated with or representing one (1) or more bank
supervisory agencies according to agreements between the parties and the
commissioner.

23-51-204. Reports of apparent crime.
(a)(1) A trust company that is the victim of a robbery, has a shortage
of corporate or fiduciary funds in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000),
or is the victim of an apparent or suspected misapplication of its corporate
or fiduciary funds or property in any amount by a director, officer, or
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
employee shall report the robbery, shortages, or apparent or suspected
misapplication to the Bank Commissioner within forty-eight (48) hours after
the time it is discovered.
(2) The initial report required under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section may be oral if the report is promptly confirmed in writing.
(b) The trust company or a director, officer, employee, or agent is
not subject to liability for defamation or another charge resulting from
information supplied in a report under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.

Subchapter 3 — Enforcement

23-51-301. Enforcement.
(a)(1) Consistent with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq., after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Bank
Commissioner may determine:
(A) That an office maintained by an out-of-state trust
institution in this state is being operated in violation of the laws of this
state or in an unsafe and unsound manner; or
(B) That a company is engaged in an unauthorized trust
activity.
(2) In either event as described in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section, the commissioner may take enforcement action as he or she would be
empowered to take if the office maintained by an out-of-state trust
institution or the company were a state trust company, including without
limitation issuing an order temporarily or permanently prohibiting the
company from engaging in a trust business in this state.
(b)(1) The commissioner may determine by order that an out-of-state
trust institution engaging in or proposing to engage in a trust business in
this state does not meet the requirements for establishing a representative
trust office in this state under § 23-51-909.
(2) An order under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is
effective on the date of issuance or other date as the commissioner shall
determine.
(c)(1) In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring
immediate action, the commissioner may take an action permitted by subsection
(a) of this section without notice or opportunity for hearing.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(2) The commissioner shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing
upon an application to rescind the action taken under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section.
(3) The commissioner shall promptly give notice to the home
state regulator of each enforcement action taken against an out-of-state
trust institution and, to the extent practicable, shall consult and cooperate
with the home state regulator in pursuing and resolving the enforcement
action.

23-51-302. Violation of administrative orders.
(a) The Bank Commissioner may:
(1) Order an authorized trust institution, or subsidiary of an
authorized trust institution, or a director, officer, or employee to cease
and desist violating this chapter or any lawful rule issued under this
chapter;
(2) Order an authorized trust institution, or subsidiary of an
authorized trust institution, or a director, officer, or employee to cease
and desist from a course of conduct that is unsafe or unsound and that is
likely to cause insolvency or dissipation of assets or is likely to
jeopardize or otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of the public in
their relationship with the authorized trust institution;
(3) Require the immediate removal from office of an officer,
director, or employee of an authorized trust institution who:
(A) Has been found to be dishonest, incompetent, or
reckless in the management of the affairs of the authorized trust
institution; or
(B) Persistently violates the laws of this state or the
lawful orders, instructions, and rules issued by the commissioner;
(4) Order a company to cease engaging in an unauthorized trust
activity; or
(5) Enter an order under § 23-51-301.
(b)(1) The commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation by an authorized trust
institution, or subsidiary of an authorized trust institution, or a director,
officer, or employee of an order issued under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(2) The commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not
more than five hundred dollars ($500) per day for each day that an authorized
trust institution, or subsidiary of an authorized trust institution, or a
director, officer, or employee violates a cease and desist order issued under
subdivision (a)(2) or subdivision (a)(3) of this section.
(c)(1) Notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be:
(A) Provided before any of the actions are taken under
this section by the commissioner; and
(B) Consistent with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure
Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(2)(A) In cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring
immediate action, the commissioner may take an action permitted by subsection
(a) of this section without notice or opportunity for hearing.
(B) The commissioner shall promptly afford a subsequent
hearing upon an application to rescind the action taken under subdivision
(c)(2)(A) of this section.

23-51-303. Civil enforcement.
The Bank Commissioner may bring a civil action against a person who the
commissioner believes has committed or is about to commit a violation of:
(1) This chapter; or
(2) A rule or order of the commissioner pertaining to this
chapter.

23-51-304. Certain criminal offenses.
(a)(1) An officer, director, employee, or shareholder of a state trust
company commits an offense if the officer, director, employee, or shareholder
of a state trust company knowingly:
(A) Conceals information or a fact or removes, destroys,
or conceals a book or record of the state trust company for the purpose of
concealing information or a fact from the Bank Commissioner or an agent of
the commissioner; or
(B) For the purpose of concealing information, removes or
destroys a book or record of the state trust company that is material to a
pending or anticipated legal or administrative proceeding.
(2) An officer, director, or employee of a state trust company
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
commits an offense if the person knowingly makes a false entry in the books
or records or in a report or statement of the state trust company.
(3) An offense under this subsection is a Class D felony.
(b) A person who knowingly fails or refuses to file the application
for acquisition of control of a state trust company as required by § 23-51-
602 commits a Class A misdemeanor.

23-51-305. When commissioner may take possession of state trust
company.
(a) The Bank Commissioner may take possession of the business and
property of a state trust company to which this chapter is applicable
whenever it appears that the state trust company:
(1) Has violated its charter or any laws applicable to the
charter of a state trust company;
(2) Is conducting its business in an unauthorized or unsafe
manner;
(3) Is in an unsafe or unsound condition to transact its
business;
(4) Has an impairment of its capital;
(5) Is in a hazardous condition;
(6) Has become otherwise insolvent;
(7) Has neglected or refused to comply with the terms of an
order issued by the commissioner;
(8) Has refused, upon proper demand, to submit its records,
affairs, and concerns for inspection and examination of an appointed or
authorized examiner of the commissioner;
(9) Is employing officers who have refused to be examined upon
oath regarding its affairs; or
(10) Has made a voluntary assignment of its assets to trustees.
(b) A state trust company that the commissioner takes possession of
under this subchapter shall remain in the commissioner’s possession until the
state trust company is authorized by the commissioner to resume business or
until the state trust company is fully liquidated under subchapter 10 of this
chapter.

Subchapter 4 — Organization of a State Trust Company
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230

23-51-401. Organization and powers of state trust company.
(a)(1) Subject to the other provisions of this chapter, one (1) or
more persons may organize and charter a state trust company.
(2) A state trust company may perform any act as a fiduciary or
engage in any trust business within or without this state.
(b) Subject to § 23-51-108, a state trust company may exercise the
powers of an Arkansas business corporation reasonably necessary or helpful to
enable exercise of its specific powers under this chapter.
(c) A state trust company may contribute to community funds, or to
charitable, philanthropic, or benevolent instrumentalities conducive to
public welfare, amounts that its board considers appropriate and in the
interests of the state trust company.
(d) Subject to § 23-51-508, a state trust company may deposit trust
funds with itself or an affiliate.
(e) Subject to obtaining any required insurance from the Federal
Deposit Insurance Corporation, a state trust company may receive and pay
deposits with or without interest, made by agencies of the United States
Government or of a state, county, or municipality.

23-51-402. State trust company principal office.
(a) A state trust company shall have and continuously maintain a
principal office in this state.
(b) An executive officer at the principal office is an agent of the
state trust company for service of process.
(c) A state trust company may change its principal office to any
location within this state by filing a written notice with the Bank
Commissioner stating:
(1) The name of the state trust company;
(2) The street address of its principal office before the
change;
(3) The street address to which the principal office is to be
changed; and
(4) A copy of the resolution adopted by the board of the state
trust company authorizing the change.
(d) The change of principal office shall take effect thirty (30) days
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
after the date the commissioner receives the notice under subsection (c) of
this section, unless the commissioner establishes another date or unless
before that day the commissioner notifies the state trust company that it has
to establish to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the relocation is
consistent with the original determination made under § 23-51-406 for the
establishment of a state trust company at that location, in which event the
change of principal office shall take effect when approved by the
commissioner.

23-51-403. Required capital.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Bank
Commissioner shall not issue a charter to a state trust company having
required capital of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(b)(1) The commissioner may require additional capital for a proposed
or existing state trust company or, on application in the exercise of
discretion consistent with protecting safety and soundness, reduce the amount
of minimum capital required for a proposed or existing state trust company,
if the commissioner finds the condition and operations of an existing state
trust company or the proposed scope or type of operations of a proposed state
trust company requires additional, or permits reduced, capital consistent
with the safety and soundness of the state trust company.
(2) The safety and soundness factors to be considered by the
commissioner in the exercise of his or her discretion under subdivision
(b)(1) of this section include without limitation:
(A) The nature and type of business conducted;
(B) The nature and degree of liquidity in assets held in a
corporate capacity;
(C) The amount of fiduciary assets under management;
(D) The type of fiduciary assets held and the depository
of the assets;
(E) The complexity of fiduciary duties and degree of
discretion undertaken;
(F) The competence and experience of management;
(G) The extent and adequacy of internal controls;
(H) The presence or absence of annual unqualified audits
by an independent certified public accountant;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(I) The reasonableness of business plans for retaining or
acquiring additional capital; and
(J) The existence and adequacy of insurance obtained or
held by the state trust company for the purpose of protecting its clients,
beneficiaries, and grantors.
(c)(1) The proposed effective date of an order requiring an existing
state trust company to increase its capital shall be stated in the order no
sooner than twenty (20) days after the date the proposed order is mailed or
delivered.
(2) Unless the state trust company requests a hearing before the
commissioner in writing before the effective date of the proposed order, the
order becomes effective and is final and nonappealable.
(3) This subsection does not prohibit an application to reduce
capital requirements of a proposed or an existing state trust company under
subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Subject to subsection (b) of this section and subchapter 12 of
this chapter, a state trust company to which the commissioner issues a
charter shall at all times maintain capital in at least the amount required
under subsection (a) of this section, plus any additional amount or less any
reduction the commissioner directs under subsection (b) of this section.

23-51-404. Change in outstanding capital and surplus.
(a) A state trust company shall not reduce or increase its outstanding
capital through dividend, redemption, issuance of shares, or otherwise
without the prior approval of the Bank Commissioner, except as permitted by
this section or rules adopted under this chapter.
(b) Unless otherwise restricted by rules, prior approval is not
required for an increase in capital accomplished through:
(1) Issuance of shares of common stock for cash;
(2) Declaration and payment of pro rata share dividends as
defined in the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq.; or
(3) Adoption by the board of the state trust company of a
resolution directing that all or part of undivided profits be transferred to
capital.
(c) Prior approval is not required for a decrease in surplus caused by
incurred losses in excess of undivided profits.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230

23-51-405. Articles of association of state trust company.
(a) The articles of association of a state trust company shall be
signed and acknowledged by each organizer.
(b) The articles of association of a state trust company shall
include:
(1) The name of the state trust company;
(2) The period of the state trust company's duration, which may
be perpetual;
(3) The powers of the state trust company, which may be stated
as:
(A) All powers granted to a state trust company in this
state; or
(B) A list of the specific powers that the state trust
company chooses and is authorized to exercise;
(4) The aggregate number of shares that the state trust company
will be authorized to issue, the number of classes of shares, which may be
one (1) or more, the number of shares of each class if more than one (1)
class, and a statement of the par value of the shares of each class or that
the shares are to be without par value;
(5) If the shares are to be divided into classes, the
designation of each class and statement of the preferences, limitations, and
relative rights of the shares of each class;
(6) Any provision granting to shareholders the preemptive right
to acquire additional shares of the state trust company;
(7) Any provision granting the right of shareholders to
cumulative voting in the election of directors of the state trust company;
(8) The aggregate amount of consideration to be received for all
shares initially issued by the state trust company and a statement signed and
verified by the organizers that the capital stock has been fully subscribed
and the purchase price for the capital stock has been paid into an escrow
account approved by the Bank Commissioner;
(9) Any provision consistent with law that the organizers elect
to state in the articles of association for the regulation of the internal
affairs of the state trust company or that is otherwise required by this
chapter to be stated in the articles of association;
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(10) The street address of the state trust company's principal
office required to be maintained under § 23-51-402; and
(11) The number of directors or managers constituting the
initial board of the state trust company, which shall not be fewer than three
(3), and the names and street addresses of the persons who are to serve as
directors until the first annual meeting of shareholders or until successor
directors have been elected and qualified.

23-51-406. Application for state trust company charter.
(a) An application for a state trust company charter shall be:
(1) Made under oath and in the form required by the Bank
Commissioner;
(2) Supported by information, data, records, and opinions of
counsel that the commissioner requires.
(3) Accompanied by a nonrefundable filing fee of not less than
three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000)
as set by rule of the commissioner; and
(4) Accompanied by proof of escrow of deposit for the required
capital.
(b)(1) The commissioner shall grant a state trust company charter only
on proof that one (1) or more viable markets exist within or outside of this
state that may be served in a profitable manner by the establishment of the
proposed state trust company.
(2) In making such a determination under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section, the commissioner shall:
(A) Examine the business plan which shall be submitted as
part of the application for a state trust company charter; and
(B) Consider the following information:
(i) The market or markets to be served;
(ii) Whether or not the proposed organizational and
capital structure and amount of initial capitalization is adequate for the
proposed business and location;
(iii) Whether or not the anticipated volume and
nature of business indicates a reasonable probability of success and
profitability based on the market sought to be served;
(iv) Whether or not the proposed officers and
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
directors of the state trust company, as a group, have sufficient fiduciary
experience, ability, standing, competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to
justify a belief that the proposed state trust company will operate in
compliance with law and that success of the proposed state trust company is
probable;
(v) Whether or not each principal shareholder of the
proposed state trust company has sufficient experience, ability, standing,
competence, trustworthiness, and integrity to justify a belief that the
proposed state trust company will be free from improper or unlawful influence
or interference with respect to the state trust company's operation in
compliance with law; and
(vi) Whether or not the organizers of the proposed
state trust company are acting in good faith.
(c) The failure of an applicant for a state trust company charter to
furnish required information, data, opinions of counsel, other material or
the required fee is considered an abandonment of the application.

23-51-407. Notice and investigation of charter application for state
trust company.
(a) The Bank Commissioner shall notify the organizers of the proposed
state trust company when the application is complete and accepted for filing
and all required fees and deposits have been paid.
(b) Upon submission of an application to the commissioner, the
organizers of the proposed state trust company shall provide:
(1) Notice through publication of one (1) notice published in a
newspaper having a general and substantially statewide circulation; and
(2) Written notice of filing through the United States mail to
all trust institutions maintaining a principal office or a trust office in
the county wherein the principal office of the proposed state trust company
is to be located.
(c)(1) The commissioner shall investigate the application for a
charter for a state trust company and inquire into the identity and character
of each proposed director, officer, and principal shareholder of the state
trust company.
(2) The investigation under subdivision (c)(1) of this section
may be conducted at the expense of the organizers of the state trust company.
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(3) The commissioner shall prepare a written report of the
investigation under this subsection, and any person may request a copy of the
nonconfidential portions of the application as provided by the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.
(4)(A) Rules adopted under this chapter may specify the
confidential or nonconfidential character of information obtained by the
State Bank Department under this section.
(B) Except as provided in rules regarding confidential
information, the financial statement of a proposed officer, director, or
principal shareholder of the state trust company is confidential and not
subject to public disclosure.

23-51-408. Written protest — Filing fee — Hearing and decision on
charter application.
(a)(1) A person shall not appear in opposition to an application for a
charter for a state trust company unless the person has filed an official
protest to the granting of the application within thirty (30) days of the
date of the notice of the filing of the application.
(2) The protest filed under subdivision (a)(1) of this section
shall:
(A) Be in writing;
(B) State the grounds for objection; and
(C)(i) Be accompanied by a filing fee of not less than two
thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for
each protestant.
(ii) The amount of the filing fee under subdivision
(a)(2)(C)(i) of this section is set by rule promulgated by the Bank
Commissioner.
(b) Once the written report of investigation under § 23-51-407 has
been completed, the commissioner may establish a time for hearing on the
charter application.
(c) Notice of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing under
subsection (b) of this section shall be given at least thirty (30) days
before the hearing, as follows:
(1) By letter from the commissioner to the organizers of the
proposed state trust company and to each trust institution to which the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
organizers of the application are required to give written notice under § 23-
51-407(a);
(2) By letter from the commissioner to each person who has filed
an official protest against the application for a charter for a state trust
company with the commissioner, provided that if a group of persons has
protested the application, the notice may be given to one (1) member of the
group; and
(3) By release to news media.
(d)(1) If the commissioner sets a hearing under subsection (b) of this
section, the commissioner shall conduct a public hearing.
(2) The commissioner may conduct as many prehearing conferences
and opportunities for discovery as the commissioner considers necessary.
(e)(1) Based on the record of a hearing conducted under subsection (d)
of this section, the commissioner shall:
(A) Determine whether or not all of the necessary
conditions stated in § 23-51-406(b) have been established; and
(B) Enter an order granting or denying the charter for a
state trust company.
(2) The commissioner may make approval of any application
conditional and shall include any conditions in the order granting the
charter.

23-51-409. Issuance of charter.
(a) A state trust company shall not engage in the trust business until
it receives its charter from the Bank Commissioner.
(b) The commissioner shall not deliver the charter for a state trust
company until the state trust company has:
(1) Elected or qualified the initial officers and directors
named in the application for charter or other officers and directors approved
by the commissioner; and
(2) Complied with all other requirements of this chapter
relative to the organization of a state trust company.
(c) If a state trust company does not open and engage in the trust
business within six (6) months after the date it receives its charter or
conditional approval of application for charter, or within the period that
may have been extended, the commissioner may revoke the charter or cancel the
02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
conditional approval of application for charter without judicial action.

23-51-410. Amendment or restatement of state trust company articles of
association.
(a) A state trust company that has been granted a charter under § 23-
51-409 or a predecessor statute may amend or restate its articles of
association for any lawful purpose, including the creation of authorized but
unissued shares in one (1) or more classes or series.
(b) An amendment authorizing the issuance of shares in series shall
contain:
(1) The designation of each series and of any variations in the
preferences, limitations, and relative rights among series to the extent that
the preferences, limitations, and relative rights are to be established in
the articles of association; and
(2) A statement of any authority to be vested in the board of
the state trust company to establish series and determine the preferences,
limitations, and relative rights of each series.
(c)(1) Amendment or restatement of the articles of association of a
state trust company and approval of the board and shareholders of the state
trust company shall be made according to the Arkansas Business Corporation
Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., for the amendment or restatement of articles of
incorporation except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules adopted
under this chapter.
(2) The original and one (1) copy of the articles of amendment
or restated articles of association shall be filed with the Bank Commissioner
for approval.
(3) Unless the submission presents novel or unusual questions,
the commissioner shall approve or reject the amendment or restatement within
thirty (30) days after the date the commissioner considers the submission
complete and accepted for filing.
(4) The commissioner may require the submission of additional
information as considered necessary to an informed decision to approve or
reject any amendment or restatement of the articles of association under this
section.
(d) If the commissioner finds that the amendment or restatement of the
articles of association of a state trust company conforms to law and any
100 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
conditions imposed by the commissioner, and any required filing fee has been
paid, the commissioner shall:
(1) Endorse the face of the original and copy with the date of
approval and the word “Approved”;
(2) File the original in the State Bank Department's records;
and
(3) Deliver a certified copy to the amendment or restatement to
the state trust company.
(e) An amendment or restatement of the articles of association of a
state trust company, if approved, takes effect on the date of approval,
unless the amendment or restatement provides for a different effective date.

23-51-411. Establishing series of shares.
(a) If the articles of association expressly give the board of a state
trust company authority to establish series and determine the preferences,
limitations, and relative rights of each series of shares, the board may do
so only in compliance with this section and any rules adopted under this
chapter.
(b)(1) A series of shares may be established by the board of a state
trust company in the manner provided by the Arkansas Business Corporation
Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., as if the state trust company were a domestic
corporation, but the shares of the series shall not be issued and sold except
upon compliance with this section.
(2) The state trust company shall file the original and one (1)
copy of the articles of amendment required by the Arkansas Business
Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., with the Bank Commissioner.
(3) Unless the submission presents novel or unusual questions,
the commissioner shall approve or reject the series of shares within thirty
(30) days after the date the commissioner considers the submission complete
and accepted for filing.
(4) The commissioner may require the submission of additional
information as considered necessary to an informed decision.
(c) If the commissioner finds that the interests of the clients and
creditors of the state trust company will not be adversely affected by the
series, that the series of shares otherwise conforms to law and any
conditions imposed by the commissioner, and that any required filing fee has
101 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
been paid, the commissioner shall:
(1) Endorse the face of the original and copy of the statement
with the date of approval and the word “Approved”;
(2) File the original in the State Bank Department's records;
and
(3) Deliver a certified copy of the statement to the state trust
company.

23-51-412. Capital notes or debentures.
(a) With the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, a state
trust company, at any time, through action of its board, and without
requiring action of its shareholders, may issue and sell its capital notes or
debentures, which shall be subordinate to the claims of depositors and may be
subordinate to other claims, including the claims of other creditors or
classes of creditors or the shareholders.
(b)(1) Capital notes or debentures may be convertible into shares of
any class or series.
(2) The issuance and sale of convertible capital notes or
debentures are subject to satisfaction of preemptive rights, if any, to the
extent provided by law.
(c) Without the prior written approval of the commissioner, interest
due or principal repayable on outstanding capital notes or debentures shall
not be paid by a state trust company when the state trust company is in
hazardous condition or insolvent, as determined by the commissioner, or to
the extent that payment will cause the state trust company to be in hazardous
condition or insolvent.
(d) The amount of any outstanding capital notes or debentures that
meet the requirements of this section and are subordinated to unsecured
creditors of the state trust company may be included in equity capital of the
state trust company for purposes of determining hazardous condition or
insolvency, and for such other purposes as may be provided by rules adopted
under this chapter.

23-51-413. Bylaws.
A state trust company shall adopt bylaws and may amend its bylaws from
time to time for the purposes and in accordance with the procedures stated in
102 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq.

23-51-414. Board of state trust company.
(a) The board of a state trust company shall be governed by the
Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-101 et seq., provided that the
board shall consist of not fewer than three (3) directors, the majority of
whom shall be residents of this state.
(b) Unless the Bank Commissioner consents in writing, a person shall
not serve as director of a state trust company if:
(1) The state trust company incurs an unreimbursed loss
attributable to a charged-off obligation of or holds a judgment against the
person or an entity that was controlled by the person at the time of funding
and at the time of default on the loan that gave rise to the judgment or
charged-off obligation;
(2) The person has been convicted of a felony; or
(3) The person has violated this chapter relating to loan of
trust funds and purchase or sale of trust property by the trustee, and the
violation has not been corrected.
(c)(1) If a state trust company does not elect directors prior to
sixty (60) days after the date of its regular annual meeting, the
commissioner may commence a proceeding to appoint a receiver under § 23-51-
1003 to operate the state trust company and elect directors or managers, as
appropriate.
(2) If the conservator is unable to locate or elect persons
willing and able to serve as directors, the commissioner may close the state
trust company for liquidation.
(d)(1) A vacancy on the board of a state trust company that reduces
the number of directors to fewer than three (3) shall be filed not later than
ninety (90) days after the date the vacancy occurs.
(2) If the vacancy has not been filled upon the expiration of
ninety (90) days following the date the vacancy occurs, the commissioner may
commence a proceeding to appoint a receiver under § 23-51-1003 to operate the
state trust company and elect a board of not fewer than three (3) persons to
resolve the vacancy.
(3) If the conservator is unable to locate or elect three (3)
persons willing and able to serve as directors, the commissioner may close
103 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
the state trust company for liquidation.
(e) Before each term to which a person is elected to serve as a
director of a state trust company, the person shall submit an affidavit for
filing in the minutes of the state trust company stating that the person, to
the extent applicable:
(1) Accepts the position and is not disqualified from serving in
the position;
(2) Will not violate or knowingly permit an officer, director,
or employee of the state trust company to violate any law applicable to the
conduct of business of the state trust company; and
(3) Will diligently perform the duties of the position.
(f) An advisory director is not considered a director if the advisory
director:
(1) Is not elected by the shareholders of the state trust
company;
(2) Does not vote on matters before the board of a state trust
company or a committee of the board and is not counted for purposes of
determining a quorum of the board or committee; and
(3) Provides solely general policy advice to the board of a
state trust company.

23-51-415. Fiduciary responsibility.
The board of a state trust company is responsible for the proper
exercise of fiduciary powers by the state trust company and each matter
pertinent to the exercise of fiduciary powers, including:
(1) The determination of policies;
(2) The investment and disposition of property held in a
fiduciary capacity; and
(3) The direction and review of the actions of an officer,
employee, and committee used by the state trust company in the exercise of
its fiduciary powers.

23-51-416. Officers of a state trust company.
(a) The board of a state trust company shall annually elect the
officers of the state trust company, who serve at the pleasure of the board.
(b)(1) The state trust company shall have a principal executive
104 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
officer primarily responsible for the execution of board policies and
operation of the state trust company and an officer responsible for the
maintenance and storage of all corporate books and records of the state trust
company and for required attestation of signatures.
(2) The board may appoint other officers of the state trust
company as the board considers necessary.
(3) The duties of any two (2) or more officers may be combined
by the board and held by one (1) person.

23-51-417. Bonding requirements.
(a) The board of a state trust company shall require protection and
indemnity for clients in reasonable amounts established by rules adopted
under this chapter against dishonesty, fraud, defalcation, forgery, theft,
and other similar insurable losses with corporate insurance or surety
companies:
(1) Authorized to do business in this state; or
(2) Acceptable to the Bank Commissioner and otherwise lawfully
permitted to issue the coverage against those losses in this state.
(b) Except as otherwise provided by rule, coverage required under
subsection (a) of this section shall include each director, officer, and
employee of the state trust company without regard to whether the person
receives salary or other compensation.
(c)(1) A state trust company may apply to the commissioner for
permission to eliminate the bonding requirement of this section for a
particular individual.
(2) The commissioner shall approve the application if the
commissioner finds that the bonding requirement is unnecessary or burdensome.
(3) Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions,
the commissioner shall approve the application or set the application for
hearing not later than sixty (60) days after the date the commissioner
considers the application complete and accepted for filing.

23-51-418. Recordkeeping.
(a) A state trust company shall keep its fiduciary records separate
and distinct from other records of the state trust company.
(b) The fiduciary records under subsection (a) of this section shall
105 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
contain all material information relative to each account as appropriate
under the circumstances.

Subchapter 5 — Permissible Activities for a State Trust Company

23-51-501. Lending limits.
(a) A state trust company's total outstanding loans and extensions of
credit to a person other than an insider shall not exceed an amount equal to
twenty percent (20%) of the state trust company's capital base.
(b)(1) The aggregate loans and extensions of credit outstanding at any
time to insiders of the state trust company shall not exceed an amount equal
to twenty percent (20%) of the state trust company's capital base.
(2) A covered transaction between an insider and a state trust
company shall be engaged in only on terms and under circumstances, including
credit standards, that are substantially the same as those for comparable
transactions with a noninsider.
(c)(1) The Bank Commissioner may adopt rules to implement and
administer this section.
(2) The commissioner may include rules:
(A) To establish limits, requirements, or exemptions other
than those specified by this section for particular classes or categories of
loans or extensions of credit; and
(B) Establish collective lending and investment limits.
(d) The commissioner may determine whether a loan or extension of
credit made to a person will be attributed to another person for purposes of
this section.
(e) A state trust company shall not lend trust deposits, except that a
trustee may make a loan to a beneficiary of the trust if the loan is
expressly authorized or directed by the instrument or transaction
establishing the trust.
(f)(1) An officer or director of a state trust company who shall
knowingly make or approve a loan in violation of this section or who shall
knowingly permit such a loan to be made, or who shall fail to exercise his or
her authority to prevent the making of the loan shall be personally liable to
the state trust company, or to the commissioner, for the full amount of the
loan.
106 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(2) However, written notice of disapproval of the loan, served
on the board of the state trust company and also the commissioner at the time
the making or existence of the loan first comes to his or her knowledge,
shall relieve an officer or director from personal liability.

23-51-502. Investment in state trust company facilities.
(a)(1) Without the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, a
state trust company shall not directly or indirectly invest an amount in
excess of its capital and surplus in state trust company facilities,
furniture, fixtures, and equipment.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by rules adopted under this
chapter, in computing this limitation a state trust company shall include:
(A) Its direct investment in state trust company
facilities;
(B) Any investment in equity or investment securities of a
company holding title to a facility used by the state trust company as
specified by subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section;
(C) Any loan made by the state trust company to or on the
security of equity or investment securities issued by a company holding title
to a facility used by the state trust company; and
(D) Any indebtedness incurred on state trust company
facilities by a company:
(i) That holds title to the facility;
(ii) That is an affiliate of the state trust
company; and
(iii) In which the state trust company is invested
in the manner described by subdivision (a)(2)(B) or subdivision (a)(2)(C) of
this section; and
(E) May exclude an amount included under subdivisions
(a)(2)(B)-(D) of this section to the extent any lease of a facility from the
company holding title to the facility is capitalized on the books of the
state trust company.
(b) Real estate acquired for a state trust facility and not improved
and occupied by the state trust company ceases to be a state trust company
facility on the fifth anniversary of the date of its acquisition, unless the
commissioner on application grants written approval to further delay in the
107 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
improvement and occupation of the property by the state trust company.
(c) A state trust company shall comply with generally accepted
accounting principles, consistently applied, in accounting for its investment
in and depreciation of state trust company facilities, furniture, fixtures,
and equipment.

23-51-503. Other real estate.
(a) A state trust company shall not acquire real estate except:
(1) As permitted by § 23-51-502 or as otherwise provided by this
chapter, including rules adopted under this chapter;
(2) If necessary to avoid or minimize a loss on a loan or
investment previously made in good faith; or
(3) With the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner.
(b) To the extent reasonably necessary to avoid or minimize loss on
real estate acquired as permitted by subsection (a) of this section, a state
trust company may exchange real estate for other real estate or personal
property, invest additional funds in or improve real estate acquired under
this subsection or subsection (a) of this section, or acquire additional real
estate.
(c) A state trust company shall dispose of any real estate subject to
subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section not later than:
(1) The fifth anniversary of the date:
(A) It was acquired, except as otherwise provided by rules
adopted under this chapter; or
(B) It ceases to be used as a state trust company
facility; or
(2) The third anniversary of the date it ceases to be a state
trust company facility as provided by § 23-51-502(b).
(d) A state trust company may apply to the commissioner for one (1) or
more extensions of time for disposing of real estate, which the commissioner
may grant if the commissioner determines that:
(1) The state trust company has made a good faith effort to
dispose of the real estate; or
(2) Disposal of the real estate would be detrimental to the
state trust company.

108 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-504. Investment in securities.
(a) A state trust company may invest its corporate funds in any type
or character of equity or investment securities subject to the limitations
provided by this section.
(b) Unless the Bank Commissioner approves maintenance of a lesser
amount in writing, a state trust company shall invest and maintain an amount
equal to not less than forty percent (40%) of the state trust company's
capital under § 23-51-403 in unencumbered cash, cash equivalents, and readily
marketable securities.
(c)(1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the total investment
in equity and investment securities of any one issuer, obligor, or maker,
held by the state trust company for its own account, shall not exceed an
amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the state trust company's capital
base.
(2) The commissioner may authorize investments in excess of this
limitation on written application if the commissioner concludes that:
(A) The excess investment is not prohibited by other
applicable law; and
(B) The safety and soundness of the requesting state trust
company is not adversely affected.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, a state trust
company may purchase for its own account, without limitation and subject only
to the exercise of prudent judgment:
(1) Direct obligations of the United States Government;
(2) Obligations of agencies and instrumentalities created by act
of the United States Congress and authorized thereby to issue securities or
evidences of indebtedness, regardless of guarantee of repayment by the United
States Government;
(3) Obligations the principal and interest of which are fully
guaranteed by the United States Government or an agency or an instrumentality
created by an act of the United States Congress and authorized thereby to
issue such a guarantee;
(4) Obligations the principal and interest of which are fully
secured, insured, or covered by commitments or agreements to purchase by the
United States Government or an agency or instrumentality created by an act of
the United States Congress and authorized thereby to issue such commitments
109 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
or agreements;
(5) General obligations of the states of the United States and
of the political subdivisions, municipalities, commonwealths, territories or
insular possessions of the United States;
(6) Obligations issued by the State Board of Education under
authority of the Arkansas Constitution or applicable statutes;
(7) Warrants of political subdivisions of the State of Arkansas
and municipalities of the State of Arkansas having maturities not exceeding
one (1) year;
(8) Prerefunded municipal bonds, the principal and interest of
which are fully secured by the principal and interest of a direct obligation
of the United States Government;
(9) The sale of federal funds with a maturity of not more than
one (1) business day;
(10) Demand, savings, or time deposits or accounts of a
depository institution chartered by the United States, any state, or the
District of Columbia, provided funds invested in the demand, savings, or time
deposits or accounts are fully insured by a federal deposit insurance agency;
(11) Repurchase agreements that are fully collateralized by
direct obligations of the United States Government, and general obligations
of any state or any political subdivision of a state, if the repurchase
agreement provides for the taking of delivery of the collateral, either
directly or through an authorized custodian; and
(12) Securities of, or other interest in, any open-end type
investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment
Company Act of 1940, and which is defined as a “money market fund” under 17
C.F.R. § 270.2a-7, as it existed on January 1, 2025, if:
(A) The portfolio of the investment company or investment
trust is limited principally to United States Government obligations and to
repurchase agreements fully collateralized by United States Government
obligations; and
(B) The investment company or investment trust takes
delivery of the collateral either directly or through an authorized
custodian.
(e) The commissioner may adopt rules to establish limits,
requirements, or exemptions other than those specified by this section for
110 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
particular classes or categories of investment, or limit or expand investment
authority for state trust companies for particular classes or categories of
securities or other property.

23-51-505. Transactions in state trust company shares.
(a) A state trust company may acquire its own shares if:
(1) The amount of its undivided profits is sufficient to fully
absorb the acquisition of the shares under regulatory accounting principles;
and
(2) The state trust company obtains the prior written approval
of the Bank Commissioner.
(b) A state trust company shall not make loans upon the security of
its own shares.

23-51-506. Mutual funds.
(a) A state trust company may invest for its own account in equity
securities of an investment company registered under the Investment Company
Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, and
the Securities Act of 1933, 15 U.S.C. § 77a et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025, if the portfolio of the investment company consists wholly of
investments in which the state trust company could invest directly for its
own account.
(b) If the portfolio of an investment company described in subsection
(a) of this section consists wholly of investments in which the state trust
company could invest directly without limitation under § 23-51-504, the state
trust company may invest in the investment company without limitation.
(c)(1) If the portfolio of an investment company described in
subsection (a) of this section contains an investment that is subject to the
limits of § 23-51-504, the state trust company shall not invest in the
investment company more than an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the
state trust company's capital base.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) of this section does not apply to a money
market fund.
(d) In evaluating investment limits under this chapter, a state trust
company shall not be required to combine:
(1) The state trust company's pro rata share of the securities
111 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
of an issuer in the portfolio of an investment company with the state trust
company's pro rata share of the securities of that issuer held by another
investment company in which the state trust company has invested; or
(2) The state trust company's own direct investment in the
securities of an issuer with the state trust company's pro rata share of the
securities of that issuer held by each investment company in which the state
trust company has invested under this section.

23-51-507. Lease financing transactions.
(a)(1) Subject to rules adopted under this chapter, a state trust
company may become the owner and lessor of tangible personal property for
lease financing transactions on a net lease basis on the specific request and
for the use of a client.
(2) Without the written approval of the Bank Commissioner to
continue holding property acquired for leasing purposes under this
subsection, the state trust company shall not hold the property more than six
(6) months after the date of expiration of the original or any extended or
renewed lease period agreed to by the client for whom the property was
acquired or by a subsequent lessee.
(b)(1) Rental payments received by the state trust company in a lease
financing transaction under this section are considered to be rent and not
interest or compensation for the use, forbearance, or detention of money.
(2) A lease financing transaction under this section is
considered to be a loan or extension of credit for purposes of this
subchapter.

23-51-508. Trust funds deposits.
(a) A state trust company may deposit trust funds with itself as an
investment if authorized by the settlor or the beneficiary, if:
(1) The state trust company maintains as security for the
deposits a separate fund of securities, legal for trust investments, under
control of a federal reserve bank or other entity approved by the Bank
Commissioner, either in this state or elsewhere;
(2) The total market value of the security is at all times at
least equal to the amount of the deposit;
(3) The separate fund is designated as a separate fund; and
112 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(4) The separate fund is maintained under the control of another
trust institution, bank, or government agency.
(b)(1) A state trust company may make periodic withdrawals from or
additions to the securities fund required by subsection (a) of this section
as long as the required value is maintained.
(2) Income from the securities in the fund belongs to the state
trust company.
(c) Security for a deposit under this section is not required for a
deposit under subsection (a) of this section to the extent the deposit is
insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor.

23-51-509. Common investment funds.
(a) A state trust company may establish common trust funds to provide
investment to itself as a fiduciary.
(b) The Bank Commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer
this section, including without limitation rules to establish investment and
participation limitations, disclosure of fees, audit requirements, limit or
expand investment authority for particular classes or categories of
securities or other property, advertising, exemptions, and other requirements
that may be necessary to administer this section.

23-51-510. Transactions with management and affiliates.
(a) Without the prior approval of a disinterested majority of the
board of a state trust company recorded in the minutes, or if a disinterested
majority cannot be obtained the prior written approval of a majority of the
disinterested directors of a state trust company and the Bank Commissioner, a
state trust company shall not directly or indirectly:
(1) Sell or lease an asset of the state trust company to an
officer, director, or principal shareholder of the state trust company or an
affiliate of the state trust company;
(2) Purchase or lease an asset in which an officer, director or
principal shareholder of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state
trust company has an interest; or
(3) Subject to § 23-51-501, extend credit to an officer,
director, or principal shareholder of the state trust company or an affiliate
of the state trust company.
113 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(b)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a lease
transaction described in subdivision (a)(2) of this section involving real
property shall not be consummated, renewed, or extended without the prior
written approval of the commissioner.
(2) For purposes of this subdivision only, an affiliate of the
state trust company does not include a subsidiary of the state trust company.
(c) Subject to § 23-51-501, a state trust company shall not directly
or indirectly extend credit to an employee, officer, director, or principal
shareholder of the state trust company or an affiliate of the state trust
company, unless:
(1) The extension of credit:
(A) Is made on substantially the same terms, including
interest rates and collateral, as those prevailing at the time for comparable
transactions by the state trust company with persons who are not employees,
officers, directors, principal shareholders, or affiliates of the state trust
company; and
(B) Does not involve more than the normal risk of
repayment or present other unfavorable features; and
(2) The state trust company follows credit underwriting
procedures that are not less stringent than those applicable to comparable
transactions by the state trust company with persons who are not employees,
officers, directors, principal shareholders or affiliates of the state trust
company.
(d) An officer or director of the state trust company who knowingly
participates in or knowingly permits a violation of this section upon
conviction is guilty of a Class D felony.
(e) The commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer this
section, including rules to establish limits, requirements, or exemptions
other than those specified by this section for particular categories of
transactions.

23-51-511. Subsidiaries.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules adopted
under this chapter, a state trust company may acquire or establish a
subsidiary to conduct any activity that may lawfully be conducted through the
form of organization chosen for the subsidiary.
114 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(b)(1) A state trust company shall not:
(A) Invest more than an amount equal to twenty percent
(20%) of its capital base in a single subsidiary; and
(B) Invest an amount in excess of forty percent (40%) of
its capital base in all subsidiaries.
(2) The amount of a state trust company's investment in a
subsidiary is the total amount of the state trust company's investment in
equity or investment securities issued by its subsidiary and any loans and
extensions of credit from the state trust company to its subsidiary.
(3) The Bank Commissioner may authorize investments in excess of
these limitations on written application if the commissioner concludes that:
(A) The excess investment is not prohibited by other
applicable law; and
(B) The safety and soundness of the requesting state trust
company is not adversely affected.
(c) A state trust company that intends to acquire, establish, or
perform new activities through a subsidiary shall submit a letter to the
commissioner describing in detail the proposed activities of the subsidiary.
(d)(1) The state trust company may acquire or establish a subsidiary
or begin performing new activities in an existing subsidiary thirty (30) days
after the date the commissioner receives the state trust company's letter
submitted under subsection (c) of this section, unless the commissioner
specifies another date.
(2) The commissioner may extend the thirty-day period of review
on a determination that the state trust company's letter raises issues that
require additional information or additional time for analysis.
(3) If the period of review is extended, the state trust company
may acquire or establish the subsidiary, or perform new activities in an
existing subsidiary, only on prior written approval of the commissioner.
(e)(1) A subsidiary of a state trust company is subject to rules
adopted under this chapter.
(2) In the absence of rules, the commissioner may regulate a
subsidiary as if it were a state trust company.

Subchapter 6 — Acquisition of Control

115 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-601. Acquisition of control — Limitations.
(a) Except as expressly otherwise permitted, a person shall not,
without the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, directly or
indirectly acquire control of a state trust company through a change in a
legal or beneficial interest in voting securities of a state trust company or
a corporation or other entity owning voting securities of a state trust
company.
(b) This subchapter does not prohibit a person from negotiating to
acquire control of a state trust company or a person that controls a state
trust company.
(c) This section does not apply to:
(1) The acquisition of securities in connection with the
exercise of a security interest or otherwise in full or partial satisfaction
of a debt previously contracted for in good faith if the acquiring person
files written notice of acquisition with the commissioner before the person
votes the securities acquired;
(2) The acquisition of voting securities in any class or series
by a controlling person who has previously complied with and received
approval under this chapter or who was identified as a controlling person in
a prior application filed with and approved by the commissioner;
(3) An acquisition or transfer by operation of law, will, or
intestate succession if the acquiring person files written notice of
acquisition with the commissioner before the person votes the securities
acquired; or
(4) A transaction exempted by the commissioner by rule or order
because the transaction is not within the purposes of this subchapter or the
rule of the commissioner that the transaction is not necessary or appropriate
to achieve the objectives of this subchapter.

23-51-602. Application for acquisition of control.
(a) The proposed transferee seeking approval to acquire control of a
state trust company or a corporation or other entity that controls a state
trust company shall file with the Bank Commissioner:
(1) An application in the form prescribed by the commissioner;
(2) The filing fee in an amount not less than one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500) and not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000),
116 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
as set by rules issued by the commissioner; and
(3) All information required by rule or that the commissioner
requires in a particular application as necessary to make an informed
decision to approve or reject the proposed acquisition.
(b) If the proposed transferee includes any group of individuals or
entities acting in concert, the information required by the commissioner may
be required of each member of the group.
(c) If the proposed transferee is not an Arkansas resident, an
Arkansas company, or an out-of-state company qualified to do business in this
state, a written consent to service of process on a resident of this state is
required for any action or suit arising out of or connected with the proposed
acquisition.
(d) The proposed transferee shall give public notice of the
application, its date of filing, and the identity of each participant, in the
form specified by the commissioner, through publication by one (1) insertion
in a newspaper of general statewide circulation, promptly after the
commissioner accepts the application as complete.

23-51-603. Hearing and decision on acquisition of control.
(a)(1) Not later than sixty (60) days after the application for
acquisition of control is officially filed under § 23-51-602, the Bank
Commissioner may approve the application or set the application for hearing.
(2) If the commissioner sets a hearing, the commissioner shall
conduct a hearing as he or she considers advisable and consistent with
governing statutes and rules.
(b) Based on the record, the commissioner may issue an order denying
an application for acquisition of control if:
(1) The acquisition of control would substantially lessen
competition, be in restraint of trade, or is not in the public interest,
unless:
(A) The anticompetitive effects of the proposed
acquisition of control are clearly outweighed in the public interest by the
probable effect of acquisition of control in meeting the convenience and
needs of the community to be served; and
(B) The proposed acquisition of control is not in
violation of law of this state or the United States;
117 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(2) The financial condition of the proposed transferee, or any
member of a group composing the proposed transferee, might jeopardize the
financial stability of the state trust company being acquired;
(3) Plans or proposals to operate, liquidate, or sell the state
trust company or its assets are not in the best interests of the state trust
company;
(4) The experience, ability, standing, competence,
trustworthiness, and integrity of the proposed transferee, or any member of a
group comprising the proposed transferee, are insufficient to justify a
belief that the state trust company will be free from improper or unlawful
influence or interference with respect to the state trust company's operation
in compliance with law;
(5) The state trust company will be insolvent, in a hazardous
condition, not have adequate capitalization, or not be in compliance with the
laws of this state after the acquisition;
(6) The proposed transferee has failed to furnish all
information pertinent to the application reasonably required by the
commissioner; or
(7) The proposed transferee is not acting in good faith.
(c)(1) If an application for acquisition of control filed under § 23-
51-602 is approved by the commissioner under this section, the transaction
may be consummated.
(2) Any written commitment from the proposed transferee offered
to and accepted by the commissioner as a condition that the application will
be approved is enforceable against the state trust company and the transferee
and is considered for all purposes an agreement under this subchapter.

23-51-604. Appeal from adverse decision.
(a)(1) If a hearing has been held and the Bank Commissioner has
entered an order denying the application for acquisition of control filed
under § 23-51-602 and the order has become final, the proposed transferee may
appeal the final order by filing a petition for judicial review under the
Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(2) The time for filing a petition for judicial review under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall run from the date the final decision
of the commissioner is mailed or delivered, in written form, to the parties
118 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
desiring to appeal.
(b) The filing of an appeal under this section does not stay the order
of the commissioner.

23-51-605. Objection to other transfer.
This subchapter shall not be construed to prevent the Bank Commissioner
from investigating, commenting on, or seeking to enjoin or set aside a
transfer of voting securities that evidence a direct or indirect interest in
a state trust company, whether or not the transfer is included within this
subchapter, if the commissioner considers the transfer to be against the
public interest.

Subchapter 7 — Mergers, Purchases and Assumptions, and Sale of Assets

23-51-701. Merger authority.
(a) With the prior written approval of the Bank Commissioner, a state
trust company may merge:
(1) With and into a state bank to the same extent as a state
bank under the Arkansas Banking Code of 1997, chapters 45-50 of this title;
or
(2) With another person to the same extent as a business
corporation under the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101
et seq., subject to this chapter.
(b) The approval of the board and the shareholders of both the state
trust company and the state bank who are parties to the merger shall be
obtained according to § 23-48-503 as if the state trust company were a state
bank, except as otherwise provided by rules adopted under this chapter.
(c) The approval of the board and the shareholders of both the state
trust company and the person or named entities who are parties to the merger
shall be obtained according to the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987,
§ 4-27-101 et seq., as if the state trust company were a domestic
corporation, except as otherwise provided by rules adopted under this
chapter.

23-51-702. Merger application.
(a) To apply for a merger under this subchapter, two (2) original
119 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
copies of the articles of merger and an application in the form required by
the Bank Commissioner shall be filed with the commissioner.
(b) The commissioner shall investigate the condition of the merging
parties.
(c) The commissioner may require the submission of additional
information as considered necessary to an informed decision.

23-51-703. Approval of merger by Bank Commissioner.
(a) The Bank Commissioner may approve a merger under this subchapter
if:
(1) A resulting state trust company will be solvent and have
adequate capitalization for its business and location;
(2) A resulting state trust company has in all respects complied
with the statutes and rules relative to the organization of a state trust
company;
(3) All fiduciary obligations and liabilities of a state trust
company that is a party to the merger have been properly discharged or
otherwise lawfully assumed or retained by a state trust company or other
fiduciary;
(4) A surviving, new, or acquiring person that is not authorized
to engage in the trust business will not engage in the trust business and has
in all respects complied with the laws of this state; and
(5) All conditions imposed by the commissioner have been
satisfied or otherwise resolved.
(b) If the commissioner approves the merger under this section and
finds that all required filing fees and investigative costs have been paid,
the commissioner shall:
(1) Endorse the face of both original copies of the articles of
merger with the date of approval and the word “Approved”;
(2) File one (1) original copy of the articles of merger in the
State Bank Department's records; and
(3) Deliver one (1) original copy of the articles of merger to
each surviving, new, or acquiring entity.
(c) A merger approved under this section is effective on the date of
approval, unless the merger agreement provides and the commissioner consents
to a different effective date.
120 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230

23-51-704. Rights of dissenters to mergers.
A shareholder of the state trust company may dissent from a merger
under this subchapter to the extent and by following the procedure provided
by the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987, § 4-27-101 et seq., or
rules adopted under this chapter.

23-51-705. Authority to purchase assets of another trust institution.
(a)(1) Subject to this section, a state trust company may purchase
assets of another state trust company or trust-related assets of another
trust institution, including the right to control accounts established with
the trust institution.
(2) Except as otherwise expressly provided by this chapter or
any other applicable statutes, the purchase of all or part of the assets of
the trust institution does not make the purchasing state trust company
responsible for any liability or obligation of the selling trust institution
that is not expressly assumed by the purchasing state trust company.
(3) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, this
subchapter does not govern or prohibit the purchase by a trust institution of
all or part of the assets of a corporation or other entity that is not a
trust institution.
(b)(1) An application in the form required by the Bank Commissioner
shall be filed with the commissioner for any acquisition of all or
substantially all of:
(A) The assets of a state trust company; or
(B) The trust assets of another trust institution by a
state trust company.
(2) The commissioner shall investigate the condition of the
purchaser and seller and may require the submission of additional information
as considered necessary to make an informed decision.
(3) The commissioner shall approve the purchase if:
(A) The acquiring state trust company will be solvent, not
in a hazardous condition, and have sufficient capital for its business and
location;
(B) The acquiring state trust company has complied with
all applicable statutes and rules, including without limitation any
121 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
applicable requirements of §§ 23-51-903 and 23-51-906;
(C) All fiduciary obligations and liabilities of the
parties have been properly discharged or otherwise assumed by the acquiring
state trust company;
(D) All conditions imposed by the commissioner have been
satisfied or otherwise resolved; and
(E) All fees and costs have been paid.
(c) A purchase requiring an application under subsection (b) of this
section is effective on:
(1) The date of approval; or
(2) On the effective date stated in the purchase agreement if
the commissioner consents to that date.
(d) The acquiring state trust company shall succeed by operation of
law to all of the rights, privileges, and obligations of the selling trust
institution under each account included in the assets acquired.

23-51-706. Sale of assets.
(a) The board of a state trust company, with the Bank Commissioner's
approval, may cause a state trust company to sell all or substantially all of
its assets, including the right to control accounts established with the
state trust company, without shareholder approval if the commissioner finds:
(1) The interests of the state trust company's clients,
depositors, and creditors are jeopardized because of insolvency or imminent
insolvency of the state trust company;
(2) The sale is in the best interest of the state trust
company's clients and creditors; and
(3) The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor
approves the transaction unless the deposits of the state trust company are
not insured.
(b) A sale under this section shall include an assumption and promise
by the buyer to pay or otherwise discharge:
(1) All of the state trust company's liabilities to clients and
depositors;
(2) All of the state trust company's liabilities for salaries of
the state trust company's employees incurred before the date of the sale;
(3) Obligations incurred by the commissioner arising out of the
122 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
supervision or sale of the state trust company; and
(4) Fees and assessments due the State Bank Department.
(c) This section does not limit the incidental power of a state trust
company to buy and sell assets in the ordinary course of business.
(d)(1) This section does not affect the commissioner's right to take
action under any other law.
(2) The sale by a state trust company of all or substantially
all of its assets with shareholder approval is deemed a voluntary dissolution
and liquidation and shall be governed by subchapter 10 of this chapter.

Subchapter 8 — Trust Offices

23-51-801. Branches of offices of state trust institutions.
(a) A state trust institution may act as a fiduciary and engage in a
trust business at each trust office as permitted by this chapter and at a
branch.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a state bank or a
state trust company shall not engage at an out-of-state office in any trust
business not permitted to be conducted at the out-of-state office by the laws
of the host state applicable to trust institutions chartered by the host
state.

23-51-802. Trust offices and representative trust offices.
(a)(1) A state trust institution may establish or acquire and maintain
trust offices or representative trust offices anywhere in this state.
(2) A state trust institution desiring to establish or acquire
and maintain a trust office or representative trust office under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section shall file an application with the Bank Commissioner
providing:
(A) The name of the state trust institution;
(B) The location of the proposed additional trust office
or representative trust office;
(C) A general description of the surrounding market area;
(D) Whether or not the location will be owned or leased;
(E) A copy of the resolution adopted by the board of the
state trust institution authorizing the additional trust office or
123 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
representative trust office;
(F) A general description of the activities to be
conducted;
(G) An estimate of the cost of the trust office or
representative trust office;
(H) Any additional information required by commissioner;
and
(I) The payment for the filing fee, if any, prescribed by
the commissioner.
(c) The commissioner may deny approval of the additional trust office
or representative trust office under subsection (a) of this section if the
commissioner finds that the applicant lacks sufficient financial resources to
undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or
soundness or that the proposed trust office or representative trust office
would be contrary to the public interest.

23-51-803. Out-of-state trust offices or representative trust offices.
(a)(1) A state bank, a state trust company, or a savings association
chartered under the laws of this state may establish and maintain a new trust
office or representative trust office or acquire and maintain a trust office
or representative trust office in a state other than this state.
(2) A trust institution desiring to establish or acquire and
maintain a trust office or representative trust office in another state under
this section shall file an application in the form prescribed by the Bank
Commissioner.
(3) The application required under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section shall provide:
(A) The name of the trust institution;
(B) The location of the proposed trust office or
representative trust office;
(C) A general description of the surrounding market area;
(D) Whether or not the location will be owned or leased;
(E) Whether or not the laws of the jurisdiction where the
trust office or representative trust office will be located permit the trust
office or representative trust office to be maintained by the trust
institution;
124 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(F) A copy of the resolution adopted by the board
authorizing the out-of-state trust office or representative trust office; and
(G) The payment for the filing fee, if any, prescribed by
the commissioner.
(b) An applicant under this section may commence business at the
additional trust office or representative trust office thirty (30) days after
the date the commissioner receives the application, unless the commissioner
specifies another date.
(c)(1) The thirty-day period of review under subsection (b) of this
section may be extended by the commissioner on a determination that the
written notice raises issues that require additional information or
additional time for analysis.
(2) If the period of review is extended, the trust institution
may establish the additional trust office or representative trust office only
on prior written approval by the commissioner.
(d)(1) The commissioner may deny approval of the additional trust
office or representative trust office under this section if the commissioner
finds that the applicant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake
the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness or
that the proposed additional trust office or representative trust office
would be contrary to the public interest.
(2) In acting on the notice, the commissioner shall consider the
views of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

Subchapter 9 — Trust Offices of Out-of-State Trust Institutions

23-51-901. Out-of-state trust institution — Engaging in trust business
at branch or trust office.
An out-of-state trust institution may act as a fiduciary in this state
or engage in a trust business at a trust office in this state only if it
maintains a trust office in this state as permitted by this chapter or a
branch in this state.

23-51-902. Establishing interstate trust office.
(a) An out-of-state trust institution that does not operate a trust
office in this state and that meets the requirements of this chapter may
125 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
establish and maintain a new trust office in this state.
(b) An out-of-state trust institution shall not establish a new trust
office in this state unless a similar institution chartered under the laws of
this state to act as a fiduciary is permitted to establish a new trust office
that may engage in activities substantially similar to those permitted to
trust offices of out-of-state trust institutions under § 23-51-901 in the
state where the out-of-state trust institution has its principal office.

23-51-903. Conditions for approval.
(a) A trust office of an out-of-state trust institution shall not be
acquired or established in this state under this chapter unless:
(1) The out-of-state trust institution has confirmed in writing
to the Bank Commissioner that for as long as the out-of-state trust
institution maintains a trust office in this state, the out-of-state trust
institution will comply with all applicable laws of this state;
(2) The applicant has provided satisfactory evidence to the
commissioner of compliance with any applicable requirements of § 4-27-1501 et
seq. and the applicable requirements of the applicant's home state regulator
for acquiring or establishing and maintaining the trust office; and
(3) The commissioner, acting within sixty (60) days after
receiving an application under § 23-51-906, has certified to the home state
regulator that the requirements of this chapter have been met and the
application has been approved or, if applicable, that any conditions imposed
by the commissioner under subsection (b) of this section have been satisfied.
(b) The out-of-state trust institution may commence business at the
trust office sixty (60) days after the date the commissioner receives the
application required under this chapter unless the commissioner specifies
another date, if, with respect to an out-of-state trust institution that is
not a depository institution and for which the commissioner has conditioned
the approval on the satisfaction by the applicant of any requirement
applicable to a state trust company under § 23-51-403 or § 23-51-406(b), the
institution has satisfied the conditions and provided to the commissioner
satisfactory evidence that the conditions have been satisfied.
(c)(1) The sixty-day period of review under subsection (b) of this
section may be extended by the commissioner on a determination that the
application raises issues that require additional information or additional
126 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
time for analysis.
(2) If the period of review is extended, the out-of-state trust
institution may establish the trust office only on prior written approval by
the commissioner.
(d)(1) The commissioner may deny approval of the trust office under
this section if the commissioner finds that the applicant lacks sufficient
financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely
affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed office is contrary to
the public interest.
(2) In acting on the notice, the commissioner shall consider the
views of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

23-51-904. Additional trust offices.
An out-of-state trust institution that maintains a trust office in this
state under this chapter may establish or acquire additional trust offices or
representative trust offices in this state to the same extent that a state
trust institution may establish or acquire additional trust offices or
representative trust offices in this state under § 23-51-802.

23-51-905. Acquiring interstate trust office.
(a) An out-of-state trust institution that does not operate a trust
office in this state and that meets the requirements of this chapter may
acquire and maintain a trust office in this state.
(b) An out-of-state trust institution shall not maintain a trust
office in this state unless a similar institution chartered under the laws of
this state to act as a fiduciary is permitted to acquire and maintain a trust
office through an acquisition of a trust office in the state where the out-
of-state trust institution has its principal office and may engage in
activities substantially similar to those permitted to trust offices of out-
of-state trust institutions under § 23-51-901 in the state where the out-of-
state trust institution has its principal office.

23-51-906. Requirement of notice.
(a) An out-of-state trust institution desiring to establish and
maintain a new trust office or acquire and maintain a trust office in this
state under this chapter shall provide, or cause its home state regulator to
127 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
provide, written notice of the proposed transaction to the Bank Commissioner
on or after the date on which the out-of-state trust institution applies to
the home state regulator for approval to establish and maintain or acquire
the trust office.
(b) The filing of the notice under subsection (a) of this section
shall be preceded or accompanied by a copy of the resolution adopted by the
board of the out-of-state trust institution authorizing the additional trust
office and the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner.

23-51-907. Trust business of out-of-state trust institution.
An out-of-state trust institution that establishes or maintains one (1)
or more trust offices in this state under this subchapter may conduct any
activity at each trust office that would be authorized under the laws of this
state for a state trust institution to conduct at a trust office.

23-51-908. Representative trust office business.
(a) An out-of-state trust institution shall not act as a fiduciary,
but may otherwise engage in a trust business, at a representative trust
office as permitted by this subchapter.
(b) Subject to the requirements contained in this subchapter, an out-
of-state trust institution may establish and maintain representative trust
offices anywhere in this state.

23-51-909. Registration of representative trust office.
(a)(1) An out-of-state trust institution may establish or acquire and
maintain a representative trust office in this state.
(2) An out-of-state trust institution not maintaining a trust
office in this state and desiring to establish or acquire and maintain a
representative trust office shall file an application in the form prescribed
by the Bank Commissioner.
(3) The application under subdivision (a)(2) of this section
shall provide:
(A) The name of the out-of-state trust institution;
(B) A certificate of good standing from the out-of-state
trust institution's chartering authority;
(C) A copy of the resolution adopted by the board
128 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
authorizing the representative trust office of the out-of-state trust
institution; and
(D) The payment for the filing fee, if any, prescribed by
the commissioner.
(b) An applicant under subsection (a) of this section may commence
business at the representative trust office on the thirty-first day after the
date the commissioner acknowledges receipt of the application, unless the
commissioner specifies an earlier or later date.
(c)(1) The thirty-day period of review under subsection (a) of this
section may be extended by the commissioner on a determination that the
application raises issues that require additional information or additional
time for analysis.
(2) If the period of review is extended, the out-of-state trust
institution may establish the representative trust office only on prior
written approval by the commissioner.
(d)(1) The commissioner may deny approval of the representative trust
office under this section if the commissioner finds that the applicant lacks
sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without
adversely affecting its safety or soundness or that the proposed
representative trust office would be contrary to the public interests.
(2) In acting on the application, the commissioner shall
consider the views of the appropriate bank supervisory agencies.

Subchapter 10 — Liquidation

23-51-1001. Voluntary liquidation.
(a) A state trust company may go into voluntary liquidation and be
closed, and may surrender the state trust company's charter and franchise as
a corporation of this state by the affirmative votes of the shareholders of
the state trust company owning a majority of the voting stock of the state
trust company.
(b)(1) Shareholder action to liquidate a state trust company shall be
taken at a meeting of the shareholders called by resolution of the board of
the state trust company.
(2) The written notice required under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall state the purpose of the meeting and be mailed to each
129 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
shareholder, or in case of a shareholder's death, to the shareholder's legal
representative, addressed to the shareholder's last known residence not less
than ten (10) days before the date of the meeting.
(3) If shareholders elect to liquidate a state trust company
under subsection (a) of this section, a certified copy of all proceedings of
the meeting at which the action has been taken, attested by an officer of the
state trust company, shall be transmitted to the Bank Commissioner for
approval.
(c)(1) If the commissioner approves the liquidation, the commissioner
shall issue to the state trust company under the commissioner's seal, an
order for that purpose.
(2) An order shall not be issued by the commissioner under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section until the commissioner is satisfied that
provision has been made by the state trust company to satisfy and pay off all
creditors.
(3)(A) When the commissioner approves the voluntary liquidation
of a state trust company, the board of the state trust company shall:
(i) Publish a notice in a newspaper with a
substantially statewide circulation published in the City of Little Rock that
the state trust company is closing down its affairs and going into
liquidation; and
(ii) Notify the creditors of the state trust company
to present their claims for payment.
(B) The notice required under subdivision (c)(3)(A)(i) of
this section shall be published one (1) time a week for four (4) consecutive
weeks.
(d) When a state trust company is in the process of voluntary
liquidation, the state trust company is subject to examination by the
commissioner and shall furnish reports from time to time as the commissioner
may require.
(e) All unclaimed property remaining in the hands of a liquidated
state trust company is subject to the Unclaimed Property Act, § 18-28-201 et
seq.
(f)(1) Upon the approval of the commissioner, a state trust company
may sell and transfer to another trust institution, whether state or
federally chartered, all of its assets of every kind upon terms as may be
130 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
agreed upon and approved by the commissioner and by a majority vote of its
board.
(2) A certified copy of the minutes of a meeting at which an
action is taken, attested by an officer of the state trust company, together
with a copy of the contract of sale and transfer, shall be filed with the
commissioner.
(3) Whenever voluntary liquidation is approved by the
commissioner or the sale and transfer of the assets of any state trust
company is approved by the commissioner, the charter of the state trust
company shall be canceled, subject, however, to its continued existence, as
provided by this chapter and the Arkansas Business Corporation Act, § 4-27-
101 et seq.

23-51-1002. Placing state trust company under Bank Commissioner’s
control.
(a)(1) A state trust company may place its assets and business under
the control of the Bank Commissioner for liquidation by a resolution of a
majority of its directors or members upon notice to the commissioner.
(2) Upon taking possession of the state trust company, the
commissioner, or the commissioner's appointed agent, shall retain possession
of the state trust company until the state trust company is authorized by the
commissioner to resume business or until the affairs of the state trust
company has fully liquidated under this chapter.
(3) A state trust company shall not make any general assignment
for the benefit of its creditors except by surrendering possession of its
assets to the commissioner, as provided under this chapter.
(b) If for any reason a state trust company suspends operations for
any length of time, the state trust company immediately upon the suspension
of operations, shall be deemed in the possession of the commissioner and
subject to liquidation under this chapter.

23-51-1003. Application of Arkansas Banking Code of 1997.
When the Bank Commissioner, or the commissioner's appointed agent,
takes possession of a state trust company under this subchapter, the
commissioner or the commissioner's appointed agent shall proceed with the
dissolution and liquidation of the state trust company under the procedures
131 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
established for the dissolution and liquidation of state banks under the
Arkansas Banking Code of 1997, chapters 45-50 of this title.

Subchapter 11 — Trusts and Fiduciaries

23-51-1101. Delegation and fiduciary responsibility.
(a) A person acting as a trustee or as any other fiduciary under the
laws of this state may delegate any investment, management, or administrative
function if the person exercises reasonable care, judgment, and caution in:
(1) Selecting the delegate, taking into account the delegate's
financial standing and reputation;
(2) Establishing the scope and other terms of any delegation;
and
(3) Reviewing periodically the delegate's actions in order to
monitor overall performance and compliance with the scope and other terms of
the delegation.
(b) Notwithstanding any delegation permitted under subsection (a) of
this section, a person acting as a trustee, except as provided in § 28-73-
807, or in any other fiduciary capacity under the laws of this state shall
retain responsibility for the due performance of any delegated fiduciary
function.

23-51-1102. Affiliates.
(a) A person acting as a trustee or in any other fiduciary capacity
under § 23-51-1101, may hire and compensate, as a delegate, an affiliate of
the person if:
(1) Authorized by a trust or fiduciary instrument;
(2) Authorized by court order;
(3) Authorized in writing by each affected client; or
(4) The standards of § 23-51-1101 are satisfied.
(b) Fees paid to an affiliate shall be competitive with fees charged
by nonaffiliates that provide substantially similar services.

23-51-1103. Fee determination.
The compensation arrangement between a client and a person acting as a
trustee or as any other fiduciary under this chapter shall be at arm's
132 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
length, and any compensation under such an arrangement shall be a reasonable
amount with respect to the services rendered.

23-51-1104. Disclosure of potential conflicts of interest.
A company, proposing to act as a trustee or in any other fiduciary
capacity under a written agreement to be entered into with a prospective
client after September 1, 2025, and that company has any potential or actual
conflict of interest that may reasonably be expected to have an impact on the
independence or judgment of the trustee or fiduciary, shall disclose
appropriate information concerning the actual or potential conflict of
interest before entering into any written or oral trust or fiduciary
agreement with the client or prospective client.

23-51-1105. Designation of trustee.
A person residing in this state may designate any trust institution to
act as a fiduciary on behalf of the person.

23-51-1106. Choice of law governing trusts.
A trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative
trust office in this state and its affected clients may designate either this
state, a state where affected clients reside, or the state where the trust
institution has its principal office as the state whose laws shall govern any
written agreement between the trust institution and its client or any
instrument under which the trust institution acts for a client.

23-51-1107. Choice of law governing fiduciary investments.
A trust institution that maintains a trust office or representative
trust office in this state and its affected clients may designate either this
state, a state where affected clients reside, or the state where the trust
institution has its principal office as the state whose laws shall govern
with respect to the fiduciary investment standards applicable to any written
agreement between the trust institution or its client and any other
instrument under which the trust institution acts for a client.

Subchapter 12 — Private Trust Company

133 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
23-51-1201. Private trust company.
(a) A private trust company engaging in the trust business in this
state shall comply with the provisions of this chapter applicable to a trust
company unless expressly exempted from those provisions in writing by the
Bank Commissioner under this section or by rule adopted by the commissioner.
(b)(1) A private trust company or proposed private trust company may
request in writing that it be exempted from specified provisions of §§ 23-51-
110, 23-51-403(a), 23-51-405(b)(11), 23-51-406(b)(1), 23-51-407, 23-51-501,
23-51-503, and 23-51-506(b)—(d).
(2) The commissioner may grant the exemption in whole or in part
if the commissioner finds that the private trust company does not and will
not transact business with the general public.
(c) An exemption granted under this section may be made subject to
conditions or limitations imposed by the commissioner consistent with this
subchapter.
(d)(1) At the expense of the private trust company, the commissioner
may examine or investigate the private trust company in connection with an
application for exemption.
(2) Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions,
the commissioner shall approve the application for exemption or set the
application for hearing not later than sixty (60) days after the date the
commissioner considers the application complete and accepted for filing.
(3) The commissioner may require the submission of additional
information as considered necessary to an informed decision.

23-51-1202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Family member" means an individual who is related within
the fourth degree of affinity or consanguinity to an individual or
individuals who control a private trust company or that is controlled by one
(1) or more trusts or charitable organizations established by the individual
or individuals; and
(2) "Transact business with the general public" means any sales,
solicitations, arrangements, agreements, or transactions to provide trust or
other business services, whether or not for a fee, commission, or any other
type of remuneration, with any client that is not a family member or a sole
134 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, association, trust, estate,
business trust, or other company that is not one hundred percent (100%) owned
by one (1) or more family members.

23-51-1203. Requirements for a private trust company.
(a)(1) A private trust company requesting an exemption from this
chapter under § 23-51-1201 shall file an application with the Bank
Commissioner containing:
(A) A nonrefundable application fee of an amount not less
than three thousand dollars ($3,000) nor more than five thousand dollars
($5,000), as set by rules issued by the commissioner;
(B) A detailed statement under oath showing the private
trust company's assets and liabilities as of the end of the month previous to
the filing of the application;
(C) A statement under oath of the reason for requesting
the exemption;
(D) A statement under oath that the private trust company
is not currently transacting business with the public and that the company
will not conduct business with the public without the prior written
permission of the commissioner;
(E) The current street mailing address and telephone
number of the physical location in this state at which the private trust
company will maintain its books and records, together with a statement under
oath that the address given is true and correct and is not a United States
Postal Service post office box or a private mailbox, postal box, or mail
drop;
(F) A listing of the specific provisions of this chapter
for which the request for exemption is made; and
(G)(i) A certification that the private trust company is
managed by, and its members are family members.
(ii) All individuals who control a private trust
company or establish trusts or charitable organizations controlling the
private trust company shall be related within the second degree of affinity
or consanguinity.
(2) The commissioner shall not approve a private trust company
exemption unless the application is completed as required in subdivision
135 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(a)(1) of this section.
(b) To maintain status as an exempt private trust company under this
chapter, the exempt private trust company shall:
(1) Not transact business with the public;
(2)(A) File an annual certification that it is maintaining the
conditions and limitations of its exempt status.
(B) The annual certification required under subdivision
(b)(2)(A) of this section shall be filed:
(i) On a form provided by the commissioner and be
accompanied by a fee set by rules issued by the commissioner; and
(ii) On or before June 30 of each year.
(C)(i) An annual certification shall not be valid unless
it bears an acknowledgment stamped by the State Bank Department.
(ii) The department shall have thirty (30) days from
the date of receipt to return a copy of the acknowledged annual certification
to the exempt private trust company.
(iii) The burden shall be on the exempt private
trust company to notify the department of a failure to return an acknowledged
copy of an annual certification within the thirty-day period.
(iv) The commissioner may examine or investigate the
exempt private trust company periodically as necessary to verify the annual
certification;
(3) Comply with the principal office provisions of § 23-51-402
and with the address and telephone requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(E) of
this section; and
(4) Pay all applicable corporate franchise taxes.

23-51-1204. Change of control.
(a) Control of an exempt private trust company shall not be
transferred or sold with exempt status.
(b) In a change of control, the acquiring control person shall comply
with this chapter, and the exempt status of the private trust company shall
automatically terminate upon the effective date of the transfer.
(c) A separate application for exempt status shall be filed if the
acquiring person wishes to obtain or continue an exemption under this
section.
136 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230

23-51-1205. Authority to revoke.
(a) The Bank Commissioner may revoke the exempt status of a private
trust company if the private trust company:
(1) Makes a false statement under oath on a document required to
be filed under this chapter or by any rule promulgated by the commissioner;
(2) Fails to submit to an examination as required by § 23-51-
1201(c);
(3) Withholds requested information from the commissioner; or
(4) Violates any provision of this section applicable to an
exempt private trust company.
(b)(1) If the commissioner determines from examination or other
credible evidence that a private trust company has violated any of the
requirements of this section, the commissioner may by personal delivery or
registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, notify the private
trust company in writing that the private trust company's exempt status has
been revoked.
(2) The notification required under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall:
(A) State grounds for the revocation with reasonable
certainty; and
(B) State the effective date of the revocation, which may
not be sooner than five (5) calendar days after the date the notification is
mailed or delivered.
(c)(1) A revocation under this section takes effect for the private
trust company if the private trust company does not request a hearing in
writing before the effective date.
(2) After taking effect the revocation is final and
nonappealable as to that private trust company, and the private trust company
shall be subject to all of the requirements and provisions of this chapter
applicable to state trust companies.
(d)(1) A private trust company shall have five (5) calendar days after
the revocation is effective to comply with the provisions of this chapter
from which it was formerly exempt.
(2) If, however, the commissioner determines, at the time of
revocation, that the private trust company has been engaging in or attempting
137 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
to engage in acts intended or designed to deceive or defraud the public, the
commissioner may shorten or eliminate, in the commissioner's sole discretion,
the five (5) calendar days compliance period.
(e) If the private trust company does not comply with this subchapter,
including the capitalization requirements as have been determined by the
commissioner as necessary to assure the safety and soundness of the private
trust company, within the prescribed time period, the commissioner may:
(1) Institute any action or remedy prescribed by this chapter,
or any applicable rule; or
(2) Refer the private trust company to the Attorney General for
to initiate a quo warranto proceeding to revoke the charter.

23-51-1206. Conversion to public trust company.
(a)(1) A private trust company may terminate its status as a private
trust company and commence transacting business with the general public.
(2) A private trust company desiring to commence transacting
business with the general public shall file an application on a form
prescribed by the Bank Commissioner.
(3) The application required under subdivision (a)(2) of this
section shall provide:
(A) The name of the private trust company;
(B) An acknowledgment that any exemption granted or
otherwise applicable to the private trust company under this subchapter,
shall cease to apply on the effective date of the notice;
(C) A copy of the resolution adopted by the board
authorizing the private trust company to commence transacting business with
the general public; and
(D) The payment of the filing fee, if any, prescribed by
the commissioner.
(b) The applicant may commence transacting business with the general
public thirty (30) days after the application is approved by the
commissioner, unless the commissioner specifies another date.
(c)(1) The thirty-day period of review under subsection (b) of this
section may be extended by the commissioner on determination that the
application raises issues that require additional information or additional
time for analysis.
138 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145

As Engrossed: S2/17/25 SB230
(2) If the period for review is extended, the applicant may
commence transacting business with the public only on prior written approval
by the commissioner.
(d) The commissioner may deny approval of the application of the
private trust company to commence transacting business with the general
public if the commissioner finds that the:
(1) Applicant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake
the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness;
(2) Proposed transacting of business with the general public
would be contrary to the public interest; or
(3) Applicant will not within a reasonable period be in
compliance with any provision of this chapter from which the applicant had
been previously exempted under this subchapter.

/s/J. Boyd





















139 02-17-2025 11:15:03 ANS145